Linux Fast-STREAMS -- problem reports.  2006-09-03
$Id: PROBLEMS,v 0.9.2.2 2006/09/01 09:28:27 brian Exp $
Copyright (c) 2001-2006  OpenSS7 Corporation. <http://www.openss7.com/>
Copyright (c) 1997-2000  Brian Bidulock <bidulock@openss7.org>
See the end for copying conditions (for this file).

7.2 Problem Reports
===================

7.2.1 Problem Report Guidelines
-------------------------------

Problem reports in the following categories should include a log file
as indicated in the table below:

`./configure'
     A problem with the configuration process occurs that causes the
     `./configure' command to fail.  The problem report must include
     the `config.log' file that was generated by `configure'.

`make compile.log'
     A problem with the build process occurs that causes the `make'
     command to fail.  Perform `make clean' and then `make compile.log'
     and attach the `config.log' and `compile.log' files to the problem
     report.

`make check.log'
     A problem occurs with the `make check' target that causes it to
     fail.  Perform `make check-clean check.log' and attach the
     `config.log', `compile.log' and `check.log' files to the problem
     report.

`sudo make install.log'
     A problem occurs with `sudo make install' that causes it to fail.
     Perform `sudo make uninstall' and `sudo make install.log' and
     attach the `config.log', `compile.log', `check.log', and
     `install.log' files to the problem report.

`[sudo] make installcheck.log'
     A problem occurs with the `make installcheck' target that causes
     the test suite to fail.  Attach the resulting
     `tests/testsuite.log' and `installcheck.log' file to the problem
     report.  There is no need to attach the other files as they are
     included in `tests/testsuite.log'.

`[sudo] make uninstall.log'
     A problem occurs with the `make uninstall' target that causes the
     test suite to fail.  Perform `sudo make uninstall.log' and attach
     the `config.log', `compile.log', `check.log', `install.log',
     `installcheck.log', `tests/testsuite.log' and `uninstall.log' file
     to the problem report.

`[sudo] make remove.log'
     A problem occurs with the `make remove' target that causes the
     test suite to fail.  Perform `sudo make remove.log' and attach the
     `config.log', `compile.log', `check.log', `install.log',
     `installcheck.log', `tests/testsuite.log' and `remove.log' file to
     the problem report.


For other problems that occur during the use of the `Linux
Fast-STREAMS' package, please write a test case for the test suite that
recreates the problem if one does not yet exist and provide a test
program patch with the problem report.  Also include whatever log files
are generated by the kernel (`cmn_err(9)') or by the `strerr(8)' or
`strace(1)' facilities (`strlog(9)').

7.2.2 Generating Problem Reports
--------------------------------

`The OpenSS7 Project' uses the `GNU GNATS' system for problem
reporting.  Although the `send-pr' tool from the `GNU GNATS' package
can be used for bug reporting to the project's `GNATS' database using
electronic mail, it is not always convenient to download and install the
`GNATS' system to gain access to the `send-pr' tool.

Therefore, the `Linux Fast-STREAMS' package provides the `send-pr'
shell script that can be used for problem reporting.  The `send-pr'
shell script can invoked directly and is a work-alike for the `GNU'
`send-pr' tool.

The `send-pr' tool takes the same flags and can be used in the same
fashion, however, whereas `send-pr' is an interactive tool(1),
`send-pr' is also able to perform batch processing.  Whereas `send-pr'
takes its field information from local databases or from using the
`query-pr' C-language program to query a remote database, the `send-pr'
tool has the field database internal to the tool.

Problem reports can be generate using `make', see `Problem Report
Targets', in the manual.  An example of how simple it is to generate a
problem report is illustrated in *Note autopr:ex0::.  

     % make pr
     SEND-PR:
     SEND-PR: send-pr:  send-pr was invoked to generate an external report.  An
     SEND-PR: automated problem report has been created in the file named
     SEND-PR: 'problem.pr' in the current directory.  This problem report can
     SEND-PR: be sent to bugs@openss7.org by calling this script as
     SEND-PR: '/home/brian/os7/scripts/send-pr --file="problem.pr"'.
     SEND-PR:
     SEND-PR: It is possible to edit some of the fields before sending on the
     SEND-PR: problem report.  Please remember that there is NO WARRANTY.  See
     SEND-PR: the file 'COPYING' in the top level directory.
     SEND-PR:
     SEND-PR: Please do not send confidential information to the bug report
     SEND-PR: address.  Inspect the file 'problem.pr' for confidential
     SEND-PR: information before mailing.
     SEND-PR:
     % vim problem.pr  # <--- follow instructions at head of file
     % make send-pr

Example 7.6: _Invoking Problem Report Generation_


Using the `make pr' target to generate a problem report has the
advantages that it will assemble any available `*.log' files in the
build directory and attach them to the problem report.

---------- Footnotes ----------

(1) `send-pr' launches the user's EDITOR to edit the problem report
before submitting it.

7.2.3 Automatic Problem Reports
-------------------------------

The `Linux Fast-STREAMS' package also provides a feature for automatic
problem report generation that meets the problem report submission
guidelines detailed in the preceding sections.

Whenever a logging makefile target (see `Logging Targets', in the
manual) is invoked, if the primary target fails, the `send-pr' shell
script is invoked to automatically generate a problem report file
suitable for the corresponding target (as described above under see
`Problem Report Guidelines', in the manual).  An example is shown in
*Note autopr:ex2::.

     % make compile.log
     ...
     ...
     make[5]: *** [libXNSdrvs_a-ip.o] Error 1
     make[5]: Leaving directory `/u6/buildel4/strxns'
     make[4]: *** [all-recursive] Error 1
     make[4]: Leaving directory `/u6/buildel4/strxns'
     make[3]: *** [all] Error 2
     make[3]: Leaving directory `/u6/buildel4/strxns'
     make[2]: *** [all-recursive] Error 1
     make[2]: Leaving directory `/u6/buildel4'
     make[1]: *** [all] Error 2
     make[1]: Leaving directory `/u6/buildel4'
     SEND-PR:
     SEND-PR: send-pr:  Make target compile.log failed in the compile stage.  An
     SEND-PR: automated problem report has been created in the file named
     SEND-PR: 'problem.pr' in the current directory.  This problem report can
     SEND-PR: be sent to bugs@openss7.org by calling 'make send-pr'.
     SEND-PR:
     SEND-PR: It is possible to edit some of the fields before sending on the
     SEND-PR: problem report.  Please remember that there is NO WARRANTY.  See
     SEND-PR: the file 'COPYING' in the top level directory.
     SEND-PR:
     SEND-PR: Please do not send confidential information to the bug report
     SEND-PR: address.  Inspect the file 'problem.pr' for confidential
     SEND-PR: information before mailing.
     SEND-PR:
     % vim problem.pr  # <--- follow instructions at head of file
     % make send-pr

Example 7.7: _Problem Report from Failed Logging Target_


7.2.4 Stand Alone Problem Reports
---------------------------------

The `Linux Fast-STREAMS' package installs the `send-pr' script and its
configuration file `send-pr.config' in `${libexecdir}/streams' along
with the validation `testsuite', see see `Test Suites', in the manual.
As with the `testsuite', this allows the `send-pr' script to be used
for problem report generation on an installed system that does not have
a build directory.

An example of invoking the package `testsuite' and then generating a
problem report for failed cases is shown in *Note Example 7.7:
autopr:ex2.

     % [sudo] /usr/libexec/streams/testsuite
     % # test cases failed...
     % /usr/libexec/streams/send-pr
     SEND-PR:
     SEND-PR: send-pr:  send-pr was invoked to generate an external report.  An
     SEND-PR: automated problem report has been created in the file named
     SEND-PR: 'problem.pr' in the current directory.  This problem report can
     SEND-PR: be sent to bugs@openss7.org by calling this script as
     SEND-PR: '/usr/libexec/streams/send-pr --file problem.pr'.
     SEND-PR:
     SEND-PR: It is possible to edit some of the fields before sending on the
     SEND-PR: problem report.  Please remember that there is NO WARRANTY.  See
     SEND-PR: the file 'COPYING' in the top level directory.
     SEND-PR:
     SEND-PR: Please do not send confidential information to the bug report
     SEND-PR: address.  Inspect the file 'problem.pr' for confidential
     SEND-PR: information before mailing.
     SEND-PR:
     % vim problem.pr  # <--- follow instructions at head of file
     % /usr/libexec/streams/send-pr --file problem.pr

Example 7.8: _Invoking `send-pr' Directly_


The advantage of the approach shown in the example is that the
`send-pr' script is capable of collecting the `testsuite.log' file and
the failed test cases and debugging scripts from the `testsuite.dir'
directory and including them in the problem report, as well as all
package pertinent information from the installed `send-pr.config'.

7.3 Known Problems
==================

`The OpenSS7 Project' does not ship software with known bugs.  All bugs
are unknown.

Verified behaviour is that behaviour that has been verified by
conformance test suites that are shipped with the `Linux Fast-STREAMS'
package.

Unverified behaviour may contain unknown bugs.

Please remember that there is *NO WARRANTY*.

See also `Bugs', in the manual, or file `BUGS' in the release directory.

 Licenses
*********

 GNU General Public License
===========================



                      GNU GENERAL PUBLIC LICENSE
                         Version 2, June 1991

     Copyright (C) 1989, 1991 Free Software Foundation, Inc.
     675 Mass Ave, Cambridge, MA 02139, USA

     Everyone is permitted to copy and distribute verbatim copies
     of this license document, but changing it is not allowed.

 Preamble
---------

  The licenses for most software are designed to take away your freedom
to share and change it.  By contrast, the GNU General Public License is
intended to guarantee your freedom to share and change free
software--to make sure the software is free for all its users.  This
General Public License applies to most of the Free Software
Foundation's software and to any other program whose authors commit to
using it.  (Some other Free Software Foundation software is covered by
the GNU Library General Public License instead.)  You can apply it to
your programs, too.

  When we speak of free software, we are referring to freedom, not price.
Our General Public Licenses are designed to make sure that you have
the freedom to distribute copies of free software (and charge for this
service if you wish), that you receive source code or can get it if you
want it, that you can change the software or use pieces of it in new
free programs; and that you know you can do these things.

  To protect your rights, we need to make restrictions that forbid anyone
to deny you these rights or to ask you to surrender the rights.  These
restrictions translate to certain responsibilities for you if you
distribute copies of the software, or if you modify it.

  For example, if you distribute copies of such a program, whether gratis
or for a fee, you must give the recipients all the rights that you
have.  You must make sure that they, too, receive or can get the source
code.  And you must show them these terms so they know their rights.

  We protect your rights with two steps: (1) copyright the software, and
(2) offer you this license which gives you legal permission to copy,
distribute and/or modify the software.

  Also, for each author's protection and ours, we want to make certain
that everyone understands that there is no warranty for this free
software.  If the software is modified by someone else and passed on, we
want its recipients to know that what they have is not the original, so
that any problems introduced by others will not reflect on the original
authors' reputations.

  Finally, any free program is threatened constantly by software patents.
We wish to avoid the danger that redistributors of a free program will
individually obtain patent licenses, in effect making the program
proprietary.  To prevent this, we have made it clear that any patent
must be licensed for everyone's free use or not licensed at all.

  The precise terms and conditions for copying, distribution and
modification follow.

    TERMS AND CONDITIONS FOR COPYING, DISTRIBUTION AND MODIFICATION
  1. This License applies to any program or other work which contains a
     notice placed by the copyright holder saying it may be distributed
     under the terms of this General Public License.  The "Program",
     below, refers to any such program or work, and a "work based on
     the Program" means either the Program or any derivative work under
     copyright law: that is to say, a work containing the Program or a
     portion of it, either verbatim or with modifications and/or
     translated into another language.  (Hereinafter, translation is
     included without limitation in the term "modification".)  Each
     licensee is addressed as "you".

     Activities other than copying, distribution and modification are
     not covered by this License; they are outside its scope.  The act
     of running the Program is not restricted, and the output from the
     Program is covered only if its contents constitute a work based on
     the Program (independent of having been made by running the
     Program).  Whether that is true depends on what the Program does.

  2. You may copy and distribute verbatim copies of the Program's
     source code as you receive it, in any medium, provided that you
     conspicuously and appropriately publish on each copy an appropriate
     copyright notice and disclaimer of warranty; keep intact all the
     notices that refer to this License and to the absence of any
     warranty; and give any other recipients of the Program a copy of
     this License along with the Program.

     You may charge a fee for the physical act of transferring a copy,
     and you may at your option offer warranty protection in exchange
     for a fee.

  3. You may modify your copy or copies of the Program or any portion
     of it, thus forming a work based on the Program, and copy and
     distribute such modifications or work under the terms of Section 1
     above, provided that you also meet all of these conditions:

       a. You must cause the modified files to carry prominent notices
          stating that you changed the files and the date of any change.

       b. You must cause any work that you distribute or publish, that
          in whole or in part contains or is derived from the Program
          or any part thereof, to be licensed as a whole at no charge
          to all third parties under the terms of this License.

       c. If the modified program normally reads commands interactively
          when run, you must cause it, when started running for such
          interactive use in the most ordinary way, to print or display
          an announcement including an appropriate copyright notice and
          a notice that there is no warranty (or else, saying that you
          provide a warranty) and that users may redistribute the
          program under these conditions, and telling the user how to
          view a copy of this License.  (Exception: if the Program
          itself is interactive but does not normally print such an
          announcement, your work based on the Program is not required
          to print an announcement.)

     These requirements apply to the modified work as a whole.  If
     identifiable sections of that work are not derived from the
     Program, and can be reasonably considered independent and separate
     works in themselves, then this License, and its terms, do not
     apply to those sections when you distribute them as separate
     works.  But when you distribute the same sections as part of a
     whole which is a work based on the Program, the distribution of
     the whole must be on the terms of this License, whose permissions
     for other licensees extend to the entire whole, and thus to each
     and every part regardless of who wrote it.

     Thus, it is not the intent of this section to claim rights or
     contest your rights to work written entirely by you; rather, the
     intent is to exercise the right to control the distribution of
     derivative or collective works based on the Program.

     In addition, mere aggregation of another work not based on the
     Program with the Program (or with a work based on the Program) on
     a volume of a storage or distribution medium does not bring the
     other work under the scope of this License.

  4. You may copy and distribute the Program (or a work based on it,
     under Section 2) in object code or executable form under the terms
     of Sections 1 and 2 above provided that you also do one of the
     following:

       a. Accompany it with the complete corresponding machine-readable
          source code, which must be distributed under the terms of
          Sections 1 and 2 above on a medium customarily used for
          software interchange; or,

       b. Accompany it with a written offer, valid for at least three
          years, to give any third party, for a charge no more than your
          cost of physically performing source distribution, a complete
          machine-readable copy of the corresponding source code, to be
          distributed under the terms of Sections 1 and 2 above on a
          medium customarily used for software interchange; or,

       c. Accompany it with the information you received as to the offer
          to distribute corresponding source code.  (This alternative is
          allowed only for noncommercial distribution and only if you
          received the program in object code or executable form with
          such an offer, in accord with Subsection b above.)

     The source code for a work means the preferred form of the work for
     making modifications to it.  For an executable work, complete
     source code means all the source code for all modules it contains,
     plus any associated interface definition files, plus the scripts
     used to control compilation and installation of the executable.
     However, as a special exception, the source code distributed need
     not include anything that is normally distributed (in either
     source or binary form) with the major components (compiler,
     kernel, and so on) of the operating system on which the executable
     runs, unless that component itself accompanies the executable.

     If distribution of executable or object code is made by offering
     access to copy from a designated place, then offering equivalent
     access to copy the source code from the same place counts as
     distribution of the source code, even though third parties are not
     compelled to copy the source along with the object code.

  5. You may not copy, modify, sublicense, or distribute the Program
     except as expressly provided under this License.  Any attempt
     otherwise to copy, modify, sublicense or distribute the Program is
     void, and will automatically terminate your rights under this
     License.  However, parties who have received copies, or rights,
     from you under this License will not have their licenses
     terminated so long as such parties remain in full compliance.

  6. You are not required to accept this License, since you have not
     signed it.  However, nothing else grants you permission to modify
     or distribute the Program or its derivative works.  These actions
     are prohibited by law if you do not accept this License.
     Therefore, by modifying or distributing the Program (or any work
     based on the Program), you indicate your acceptance of this
     License to do so, and all its terms and conditions for copying,
     distributing or modifying the Program or works based on it.

  7. Each time you redistribute the Program (or any work based on the
     Program), the recipient automatically receives a license from the
     original licensor to copy, distribute or modify the Program
     subject to these terms and conditions.  You may not impose any
     further restrictions on the recipients' exercise of the rights
     granted herein.  You are not responsible for enforcing compliance
     by third parties to this License.

  8. If, as a consequence of a court judgment or allegation of patent
     infringement or for any other reason (not limited to patent
     issues), conditions are imposed on you (whether by court order,
     agreement or otherwise) that contradict the conditions of this
     License, they do not excuse you from the conditions of this
     License.  If you cannot distribute so as to satisfy simultaneously
     your obligations under this License and any other pertinent
     obligations, then as a consequence you may not distribute the
     Program at all.  For example, if a patent license would not permit
     royalty-free redistribution of the Program by all those who
     receive copies directly or indirectly through you, then the only
     way you could satisfy both it and this License would be to refrain
     entirely from distribution of the Program.

     If any portion of this section is held invalid or unenforceable
     under any particular circumstance, the balance of the section is
     intended to apply and the section as a whole is intended to apply
     in other circumstances.

     It is not the purpose of this section to induce you to infringe any
     patents or other property right claims or to contest validity of
     any such claims; this section has the sole purpose of protecting
     the integrity of the free software distribution system, which is
     implemented by public license practices.  Many people have made
     generous contributions to the wide range of software distributed
     through that system in reliance on consistent application of that
     system; it is up to the author/donor to decide if he or she is
     willing to distribute software through any other system and a
     licensee cannot impose that choice.

     This section is intended to make thoroughly clear what is believed
     to be a consequence of the rest of this License.

  9. If the distribution and/or use of the Program is restricted in
     certain countries either by patents or by copyrighted interfaces,
     the original copyright holder who places the Program under this
     License may add an explicit geographical distribution limitation
     excluding those countries, so that distribution is permitted only
     in or among countries not thus excluded.  In such case, this
     License incorporates the limitation as if written in the body of
     this License.

 10. The Free Software Foundation may publish revised and/or new
     versions of the General Public License from time to time.  Such
     new versions will be similar in spirit to the present version, but
     may differ in detail to address new problems or concerns.

     Each version is given a distinguishing version number.  If the
     Program specifies a version number of this License which applies
     to it and "any later version", you have the option of following
     the terms and conditions either of that version or of any later
     version published by the Free Software Foundation.  If the Program
     does not specify a version number of this License, you may choose
     any version ever published by the Free Software Foundation.

 11. If you wish to incorporate parts of the Program into other free
     programs whose distribution conditions are different, write to the
     author to ask for permission.  For software which is copyrighted
     by the Free Software Foundation, write to the Free Software
     Foundation; we sometimes make exceptions for this.  Our decision
     will be guided by the two goals of preserving the free status of
     all derivatives of our free software and of promoting the sharing
     and reuse of software generally.

                                NO WARRANTY

 12. BECAUSE THE PROGRAM IS LICENSED FREE OF CHARGE, THERE IS NO
     WARRANTY FOR THE PROGRAM, TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE
     LAW.  EXCEPT WHEN OTHERWISE STATED IN WRITING THE COPYRIGHT
     HOLDERS AND/OR OTHER PARTIES PROVIDE THE PROGRAM "AS IS" WITHOUT
     WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, BUT
     NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND
     FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  THE ENTIRE RISK AS TO THE
     QUALITY AND PERFORMANCE OF THE PROGRAM IS WITH YOU.  SHOULD THE
     PROGRAM PROVE DEFECTIVE, YOU ASSUME THE COST OF ALL NECESSARY
     SERVICING, REPAIR OR CORRECTION.

 13. IN NO EVENT UNLESS REQUIRED BY APPLICABLE LAW OR AGREED TO IN
     WRITING WILL ANY COPYRIGHT HOLDER, OR ANY OTHER PARTY WHO MAY
     MODIFY AND/OR REDISTRIBUTE THE PROGRAM AS PERMITTED ABOVE, BE
     LIABLE TO YOU FOR DAMAGES, INCLUDING ANY GENERAL, SPECIAL,
     INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF THE USE OR
     INABILITY TO USE THE PROGRAM (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO LOSS OF
     DATA OR DATA BEING RENDERED INACCURATE OR LOSSES SUSTAINED BY YOU
     OR THIRD PARTIES OR A FAILURE OF THE PROGRAM TO OPERATE WITH ANY
     OTHER PROGRAMS), EVEN IF SUCH HOLDER OR OTHER PARTY HAS BEEN
     ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.

                      END OF TERMS AND CONDITIONS

 How to Apply These Terms to Your New Programs
----------------------------------------------

  If you develop a new program, and you want it to be of the greatest
possible use to the public, the best way to achieve this is to make it
free software which everyone can redistribute and change under these
terms.

  To do so, attach the following notices to the program.  It is safest to
attach them to the start of each source file to most effectively convey
the exclusion of warranty; and each file should have at least the
"copyright" line and a pointer to where the full notice is found.

     ONE LINE TO GIVE THE PROGRAM'S NAME AND AN IDEA OF WHAT IT DOES.
     Copyright (C) 19YY  NAME OF AUTHOR

     This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
     modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License
     as published by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2
     of the License, or (at your option) any later version.

     This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
     but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
     MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
     GNU General Public License for more details.

     You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
     along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
     Foundation, Inc., 675 Mass Ave, Cambridge, MA 02139, USA.

Also add information on how to contact you by electronic and paper mail.

If the program is interactive, make it output a short notice like this
when it starts in an interactive mode:

     Gnomovision version 69, Copyright (C) 19YY NAME OF AUTHOR
     Gnomovision comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY; for details
     type `show w'.  This is free software, and you are welcome
     to redistribute it under certain conditions; type `show c'
     for details.

The hypothetical commands `show w' and `show c' should show the
appropriate parts of the General Public License.  Of course, the
commands you use may be called something other than `show w' and `show
c'; they could even be mouse-clicks or menu items--whatever suits your
program.

You should also get your employer (if you work as a programmer) or your
school, if any, to sign a "copyright disclaimer" for the program, if
necessary.  Here is a sample; alter the names:

     Yoyodyne, Inc., hereby disclaims all copyright
     interest in the program `Gnomovision'
     (which makes passes at compilers) written
     by James Hacker.

     SIGNATURE OF TY COON, 1 April 1989
     Ty Coon, President of Vice

This General Public License does not permit incorporating your program
into proprietary programs.  If your program is a subroutine library,
you may consider it more useful to permit linking proprietary
applications with the library.  If this is what you want to do, use the
GNU Library General Public License instead of this License.

 GNU Lesser General Public License
==================================



                   GNU LESSER GENERAL PUBLIC LICENSE
                      Version 2.1, February 1999

     Copyright (C) 1991, 1999 Free Software Foundation, Inc.
     59 Temple Place - Suite 330, Boston, MA 02111-1307, USA

     Everyone is permitted to copy and distribute verbatim copies
     of this license document, but changing it is not allowed.

     [This is the first released version of the Lesser GPL.  It also counts
     as the successor of the GNU Library Public License, version 2, hence the
     version number 2.1.]

 Preamble
---------

  The licenses for most software are designed to take away your freedom
to share and change it.  By contrast, the GNU General Public Licenses
are intended to guarantee your freedom to share and change free
software--to make sure the software is free for all its users.

  This license, the Lesser General Public License, applies to some
specially designated software--typically libraries--of the Free
Software Foundation and other authors who decide to use it.  You can use
it too, but we suggest you first think carefully about whether this
license or the ordinary General Public License is the better strategy to
use in any particular case, based on the explanations below.

  When we speak of free software, we are referring to freedom of use, not
price.  Our General Public Licenses are designed to make sure that you
have the freedom to distribute copies of free software (and charge for
this service if you wish); that you receive source code or can get it
if you want it; that you can change the software and use pieces of it
in new free programs; and that you are informed that you can do these
things.

  To protect your rights, we need to make restrictions that forbid
distributors to deny you these rights or to ask you to surrender these
rights.  These restrictions translate to certain responsibilities for
you if you distribute copies of the library or if you modify it.

  For example, if you distribute copies of the library, whether gratis or
for a fee, you must give the recipients all the rights that we gave
you.  You must make sure that they, too, receive or can get the source
code.  If you link other code with the library, you must provide
complete object files to the recipients, so that they can relink them
with the library after making changes to the library and recompiling
it.  And you must show them these terms so they know their rights.

  We protect your rights with a two-step method: (1) we copyright the
library, and (2) we offer you this license, which gives you legal
permission to copy, distribute and/or modify the library.

  To protect each distributor, we want to make it very clear that there
is no warranty for the free library.  Also, if the library is modified
by someone else and passed on, the recipients should know that what
they have is not the original version, so that the original author's
reputation will not be affected by problems that might be introduced by
others.

  Finally, software patents pose a constant threat to the existence of
any free program.  We wish to make sure that a company cannot
effectively restrict the users of a free program by obtaining a
restrictive license from a patent holder.  Therefore, we insist that
any patent license obtained for a version of the library must be
consistent with the full freedom of use specified in this license.

  Most GNU software, including some libraries, is covered by the ordinary
GNU General Public License.  This license, the GNU Lesser General
Public License, applies to certain designated libraries, and is quite
different from the ordinary General Public License.  We use this
license for certain libraries in order to permit linking those
libraries into non-free programs.

  When a program is linked with a library, whether statically or using a
shared library, the combination of the two is legally speaking a
combined work, a derivative of the original library.  The ordinary
General Public License therefore permits such linking only if the
entire combination fits its criteria of freedom.  The Lesser General
Public License permits more lax criteria for linking other code with
the library.

  We call this license the "Lesser" General Public License because it
does _Less_ to protect the user's freedom than the ordinary General
Public License.  It also provides other free software developers Less
of an advantage over competing non-free programs.  These disadvantages
are the reason we use the ordinary General Public License for many
libraries.  However, the Lesser license provides advantages in certain
special circumstances.

  For example, on rare occasions, there may be a special need to
encourage the widest possible use of a certain library, so that it
becomes a de-facto standard.  To achieve this, non-free programs must be
allowed to use the library.  A more frequent case is that a free
library does the same job as widely used non-free libraries.  In this
case, there is little to gain by limiting the free library to free
software only, so we use the Lesser General Public License.

  In other cases, permission to use a particular library in non-free
programs enables a greater number of people to use a large body of free
software.  For example, permission to use the GNU C Library in non-free
programs enables many more people to use the whole GNU operating
system, as well as its variant, the GNU/Linux operating system.

  Although the Lesser General Public License is Less protective of the
users' freedom, it does ensure that the user of a program that is
linked with the Library has the freedom and the wherewithal to run that
program using a modified version of the Library.

  The precise terms and conditions for copying, distribution and
modification follow.  Pay close attention to the difference between a
"work based on the library" and a "work that uses the library".  The
former contains code derived from the library, whereas the latter must
be combined with the library in order to run.

    TERMS AND CONDITIONS FOR COPYING, DISTRIBUTION AND MODIFICATION
  0. This License Agreement applies to any software library or other
     program which contains a notice placed by the copyright holder or
     other authorized party saying it may be distributed under the
     terms of this Lesser General Public License (also called "this
     License").  Each licensee is addressed as "you".

       A "library" means a collection of software functions and/or data
     prepared so as to be conveniently linked with application programs
     (which use some of those functions and data) to form executables.

       The "Library", below, refers to any such software library or work
     which has been distributed under these terms.  A "work based on the
     Library" means either the Library or any derivative work under
     copyright law: that is to say, a work containing the Library or a
     portion of it, either verbatim or with modifications and/or
     translated straightforwardly into another language.  (Hereinafter,
     translation is included without limitation in the term
     "modification".)

       "Source code" for a work means the preferred form of the work for
     making modifications to it.  For a library, complete source code
     means all the source code for all modules it contains, plus any
     associated interface definition files, plus the scripts used to
     control compilation and installation of the library.

       Activities other than copying, distribution and modification are
     not covered by this License; they are outside its scope.  The act
     of running a program using the Library is not restricted, and
     output from such a program is covered only if its contents
     constitute a work based on the Library (independent of the use of
     the Library in a tool for writing it).  Whether that is true
     depends on what the Library does and what the program that uses
     the Library does.

  1. You may copy and distribute verbatim copies of the Library's
     complete source code as you receive it, in any medium, provided
     that you conspicuously and appropriately publish on each copy an
     appropriate copyright notice and disclaimer of warranty; keep
     intact all the notices that refer to this License and to the
     absence of any warranty; and distribute a copy of this License
     along with the Library.

       You may charge a fee for the physical act of transferring a copy,
     and you may at your option offer warranty protection in exchange
     for a fee.

  2. You may modify your copy or copies of the Library or any portion
     of it, thus forming a work based on the Library, and copy and
     distribute such modifications or work under the terms of Section 1
     above, provided that you also meet all of these conditions:

       a. The modified work must itself be a software library.

       b. You must cause the files modified to carry prominent notices
          stating that you changed the files and the date of any change.

       c. You must cause the whole of the work to be licensed at no
          charge to all third parties under the terms of this License.

       d. If a facility in the modified Library refers to a function or
          a table of data to be supplied by an application program that
          uses the facility, other than as an argument passed when the
          facility is invoked, then you must make a good faith effort
          to ensure that, in the event an application does not supply
          such function or table, the facility still operates, and
          performs whatever part of its purpose remains meaningful.

          (For example, a function in a library to compute square roots
          has a purpose that is entirely well-defined independent of the
          application.  Therefore, Subsection 2d requires that any
          application-supplied function or table used by this function
          must be optional: if the application does not supply it, the
          square root function must still compute square roots.)

     These requirements apply to the modified work as a whole.  If
     identifiable sections of that work are not derived from the
     Library, and can be reasonably considered independent and separate
     works in themselves, then this License, and its terms, do not
     apply to those sections when you distribute them as separate
     works.  But when you distribute the same sections as part of a
     whole which is a work based on the Library, the distribution of
     the whole must be on the terms of this License, whose permissions
     for other licensees extend to the entire whole, and thus to each
     and every part regardless of who wrote it.

     Thus, it is not the intent of this section to claim rights or
     contest your rights to work written entirely by you; rather, the
     intent is to exercise the right to control the distribution of
     derivative or collective works based on the Library.

     In addition, mere aggregation of another work not based on the
     Library with the Library (or with a work based on the Library) on
     a volume of a storage or distribution medium does not bring the
     other work under the scope of this License.

  3. You may opt to apply the terms of the ordinary GNU General Public
     License instead of this License to a given copy of the Library.
     To do this, you must alter all the notices that refer to this
     License, so that they refer to the ordinary GNU General Public
     License, version 2, instead of to this License.  (If a newer
     version than version 2 of the ordinary GNU General Public License
     has appeared, then you can specify that version instead if you
     wish.)  Do not make any other change in these notices.

       Once this change is made in a given copy, it is irreversible for
     that copy, so the ordinary GNU General Public License applies to
     all subsequent copies and derivative works made from that copy.

       This option is useful when you wish to copy part of the code of
     the Library into a program that is not a library.

  4. You may copy and distribute the Library (or a portion or
     derivative of it, under Section 2) in object code or executable
     form under the terms of Sections 1 and 2 above provided that you
     accompany it with the complete corresponding machine-readable
     source code, which must be distributed under the terms of Sections
     1 and 2 above on a medium customarily used for software
     interchange.

       If distribution of object code is made by offering access to copy
     from a designated place, then offering equivalent access to copy
     the source code from the same place satisfies the requirement to
     distribute the source code, even though third parties are not
     compelled to copy the source along with the object code.

  5. A program that contains no derivative of any portion of the
     Library, but is designed to work with the Library by being
     compiled or linked with it, is called a "work that uses the
     Library".  Such a work, in isolation, is not a derivative work of
     the Library, and therefore falls outside the scope of this License.

       However, linking a "work that uses the Library" with the Library
     creates an executable that is a derivative of the Library (because
     it contains portions of the Library), rather than a "work that
     uses the library".  The executable is therefore covered by this
     License.  Section 6 states terms for distribution of such
     executables.

       When a "work that uses the Library" uses material from a header
     file that is part of the Library, the object code for the work may
     be a derivative work of the Library even though the source code is
     not.  Whether this is true is especially significant if the work
     can be linked without the Library, or if the work is itself a
     library.  The threshold for this to be true is not precisely
     defined by law.

       If such an object file uses only numerical parameters, data
     structure layouts and accessors, and small macros and small inline
     functions (ten lines or less in length), then the use of the object
     file is unrestricted, regardless of whether it is legally a
     derivative work.  (Executables containing this object code plus
     portions of the Library will still fall under Section 6.)

       Otherwise, if the work is a derivative of the Library, you may
     distribute the object code for the work under the terms of Section
     6.  Any executables containing that work also fall under Section 6,
     whether or not they are linked directly with the Library itself.

  6. As an exception to the Sections above, you may also combine or
     link a "work that uses the Library" with the Library to produce a
     work containing portions of the Library, and distribute that work
     under terms of your choice, provided that the terms permit
     modification of the work for the customer's own use and reverse
     engineering for debugging such modifications.

       You must give prominent notice with each copy of the work that the
     Library is used in it and that the Library and its use are covered
     by this License.  You must supply a copy of this License.  If the
     work during execution displays copyright notices, you must include
     the copyright notice for the Library among them, as well as a
     reference directing the user to the copy of this License.  Also,
     you must do one of these things:

       a. Accompany the work with the complete corresponding
          machine-readable source code for the Library including
          whatever changes were used in the work (which must be
          distributed under Sections 1 and 2 above); and, if the work
          is an executable linked with the Library, with the complete
          machine-readable "work that uses the Library", as object code
          and/or source code, so that the user can modify the Library
          and then relink to produce a modified executable containing
          the modified Library.  (It is understood that the user who
          changes the contents of definitions files in the Library will
          not necessarily be able to recompile the application to use
          the modified definitions.)

       b. Use a suitable shared library mechanism for linking with the
          Library.  A suitable mechanism is one that (1) uses at run
          time a copy of the library already present on the user's
          computer system, rather than copying library functions into
          the executable, and (2) will operate properly with a modified
          version of the library, if the user installs one, as long as
          the modified version is interface-compatible with the version
          that the work was made with.

       c. Accompany the work with a written offer, valid for at least
          three years, to give the same user the materials specified in
          Subsection 6a, above, for a charge no more than the cost of
          performing this distribution.

       d. If distribution of the work is made by offering access to copy
          from a designated place, offer equivalent access to copy the
          above specified materials from the same place.

       e. Verify that the user has already received a copy of these
          materials or that you have already sent this user a copy.

       For an executable, the required form of the "work that uses the
     Library" must include any data and utility programs needed for
     reproducing the executable from it.  However, as a special
     exception, the materials to be distributed need not include
     anything that is normally distributed (in either source or binary
     form) with the major components (compiler, kernel, and so on) of
     the operating system on which the executable runs, unless that
     component itself accompanies the executable.

       It may happen that this requirement contradicts the license
     restrictions of other proprietary libraries that do not normally
     accompany the operating system.  Such a contradiction means you
     cannot use both them and the Library together in an executable
     that you distribute.

  7. You may place library facilities that are a work based on the
     Library side-by-side in a single library together with other
     library facilities not covered by this License, and distribute
     such a combined library, provided that the separate distribution
     of the work based on the Library and of the other library
     facilities is otherwise permitted, and provided that you do these
     two things:

       a. Accompany the combined library with a copy of the same work
          based on the Library, uncombined with any other library
          facilities.  This must be distributed under the terms of the
          Sections above.

       b. Give prominent notice with the combined library of the fact
          that part of it is a work based on the Library, and explaining
          where to find the accompanying uncombined form of the same
          work.

  8. You may not copy, modify, sublicense, link with, or distribute the
     Library except as expressly provided under this License.  Any
     attempt otherwise to copy, modify, sublicense, link with, or
     distribute the Library is void, and will automatically terminate
     your rights under this License.  However, parties who have
     received copies, or rights, from you under this License will not
     have their licenses terminated so long as such parties remain in
     full compliance.

  9. You are not required to accept this License, since you have not
     signed it.  However, nothing else grants you permission to modify
     or distribute the Library or its derivative works.  These actions
     are prohibited by law if you do not accept this License.
     Therefore, by modifying or distributing the Library (or any work
     based on the Library), you indicate your acceptance of this
     License to do so, and all its terms and conditions for copying,
     distributing or modifying the Library or works based on it.

 10. Each time you redistribute the Library (or any work based on the
     Library), the recipient automatically receives a license from the
     original licensor to copy, distribute, link with or modify the
     Library subject to these terms and conditions.  You may not impose
     any further restrictions on the recipients' exercise of the rights
     granted herein.  You are not responsible for enforcing compliance
     by third parties with this License.

 11. If, as a consequence of a court judgment or allegation of patent
     infringement or for any other reason (not limited to patent
     issues), conditions are imposed on you (whether by court order,
     agreement or otherwise) that contradict the conditions of this
     License, they do not excuse you from the conditions of this
     License.  If you cannot distribute so as to satisfy simultaneously
     your obligations under this License and any other pertinent
     obligations, then as a consequence you may not distribute the
     Library at all.  For example, if a patent license would not permit
     royalty-free redistribution of the Library by all those who
     receive copies directly or indirectly through you, then the only
     way you could satisfy both it and this License would be to refrain
     entirely from distribution of the Library.

     If any portion of this section is held invalid or unenforceable
     under any particular circumstance, the balance of the section is
     intended to apply, and the section as a whole is intended to apply
     in other circumstances.

     It is not the purpose of this section to induce you to infringe any
     patents or other property right claims or to contest validity of
     any such claims; this section has the sole purpose of protecting
     the integrity of the free software distribution system which is
     implemented by public license practices.  Many people have made
     generous contributions to the wide range of software distributed
     through that system in reliance on consistent application of that
     system; it is up to the author/donor to decide if he or she is
     willing to distribute software through any other system and a
     licensee cannot impose that choice.

     This section is intended to make thoroughly clear what is believed
     to be a consequence of the rest of this License.

 12. If the distribution and/or use of the Library is restricted in
     certain countries either by patents or by copyrighted interfaces,
     the original copyright holder who places the Library under this
     License may add an explicit geographical distribution limitation
     excluding those countries, so that distribution is permitted only
     in or among countries not thus excluded.  In such case, this
     License incorporates the limitation as if written in the body of
     this License.

 13. The Free Software Foundation may publish revised and/or new
     versions of the Lesser General Public License from time to time.
     Such new versions will be similar in spirit to the present version,
     but may differ in detail to address new problems or concerns.

     Each version is given a distinguishing version number.  If the
     Library specifies a version number of this License which applies
     to it and "any later version", you have the option of following
     the terms and conditions either of that version or of any later
     version published by the Free Software Foundation.  If the Library
     does not specify a license version number, you may choose any
     version ever published by the Free Software Foundation.

 14. If you wish to incorporate parts of the Library into other free
     programs whose distribution conditions are incompatible with these,
     write to the author to ask for permission.  For software which is
     copyrighted by the Free Software Foundation, write to the Free
     Software Foundation; we sometimes make exceptions for this.  Our
     decision will be guided by the two goals of preserving the free
     status of all derivatives of our free software and of promoting
     the sharing and reuse of software generally.

                                NO WARRANTY

 15. BECAUSE THE LIBRARY IS LICENSED FREE OF CHARGE, THERE IS NO
     WARRANTY FOR THE LIBRARY, TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE
     LAW.  EXCEPT WHEN OTHERWISE STATED IN WRITING THE COPYRIGHT
     HOLDERS AND/OR OTHER PARTIES PROVIDE THE LIBRARY "AS IS" WITHOUT
     WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESSED OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, BUT
     NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND
     FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  THE ENTIRE RISK AS TO THE
     QUALITY AND PERFORMANCE OF THE LIBRARY IS WITH YOU.  SHOULD THE
     LIBRARY PROVE DEFECTIVE, YOU ASSUME THE COST OF ALL NECESSARY
     SERVICING, REPAIR OR CORRECTION.

 16. IN NO EVENT UNLESS REQUIRED BY APPLICABLE LAW OR AGREED TO IN
     WRITING WILL ANY COPYRIGHT HOLDER, OR ANY OTHER PARTY WHO MAY
     MODIFY AND/OR REDISTRIBUTE THE LIBRARY AS PERMITTED ABOVE, BE
     LIABLE TO YOU FOR DAMAGES, INCLUDING ANY GENERAL, SPECIAL,
     INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF THE USE OR
     INABILITY TO USE THE LIBRARY (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO LOSS OF
     DATA OR DATA BEING RENDERED INACCURATE OR LOSSES SUSTAINED BY YOU
     OR THIRD PARTIES OR A FAILURE OF THE LIBRARY TO OPERATE WITH ANY
     OTHER SOFTWARE), EVEN IF SUCH HOLDER OR OTHER PARTY HAS BEEN
     ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.

                      END OF TERMS AND CONDITIONS

 How to Apply These Terms to Your New Libraries
-----------------------------------------------

  If you develop a new library, and you want it to be of the greatest
possible use to the public, we recommend making it free software that
everyone can redistribute and change.  You can do so by permitting
redistribution under these terms (or, alternatively, under the terms of
the ordinary General Public License).

  To apply these terms, attach the following notices to the library.  It
is safest to attach them to the start of each source file to most
effectively convey the exclusion of warranty; and each file should have
at least the "copyright" line and a pointer to where the full notice is
found.

     ONE LINE TO GIVE THE LIBRARY'S NAME AND AN IDEA OF WHAT IT DOES.
     Copyright (C) YEAR  NAME OF AUTHOR

     This library is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify it
     under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
     the Free Software Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at
     your option) any later version.

     This library is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
     WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
     MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
     Lesser General Public License for more details.

     You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
     License along with this library; if not, write to the Free Software
     Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place, Suite 330, Boston, MA 02111-1307,
     USA.

Also add information on how to contact you by electronic and paper mail.

You should also get your employer (if you work as a programmer) or your
school, if any, to sign a "copyright disclaimer" for the library, if
necessary.  Here is a sample; alter the names:

     Yoyodyne, Inc., hereby disclaims all copyright interest in the library
     `Frob' (a library for tweaking knobs) written by James Random Hacker.

     SIGNATURE OF TY COON, 1 April 1990
     Ty Coon, President of Vice

That's all there is to it!

 GNU Free Documentation License
===============================



                    GNU FREE DOCUMENTATION LICENSE
                        Version 1.1, March 2000

     Copyright (C) 2000 Free Software Foundation, Inc.
     59 Temple Place, Suite 330, Boston, MA  02111-1307, USA

     Everyone is permitted to copy and distribute verbatim copies
     of this license document, but changing it is not allowed.

 Preamble
---------

The purpose of this License is to make a manual, textbook, or other
written document "free" in the sense of freedom: to assure everyone the
effective freedom to copy and redistribute it, with or without
modifying it, either commercially or noncommercially.  Secondarily,
this License preserves for the author and publisher a way to get credit
for their work, while not being considered responsible for
modifications made by others.

This License is a kind of "copyleft", which means that derivative works
of the document must themselves be free in the same sense.  It
complements the GNU General Public License, which is a copyleft license
designed for free software.

We have designed this License in order to use it for manuals for free
software, because free software needs free documentation: a free
program should come with manuals providing the same freedoms that the
software does.  But this License is not limited to software manuals; it
can be used for any textual work, regardless of subject matter or
whether it is published as a printed book.  We recommend this License
principally for works whose purpose is instruction or reference.

    TERMS AND CONDITIONS FOR COPYING, DISTRIBUTION AND MODIFICATION
  1. APPLICABILITY AND DEFINITIONS

     This License applies to any manual or other work that contains a
     notice placed by the copyright holder saying it can be distributed
     under the terms of this License.  The "Document", below, refers to
     any such manual or work.  Any member of the public is a licensee,
     and is addressed as "you".

     A "Modified Version" of the Document means any work containing the
     Document or a portion of it, either copied verbatim, or with
     modifications and/or translated into another language.

     A "Secondary Section" is a named appendix or a front-matter
     section of the Document that deals exclusively with the
     relationship of the publishers or authors of the Document to the
     Document's overall subject (or to related matters) and contains
     nothing that could fall directly within that overall subject.
     (For example, if the Document is in part a textbook of
     mathematics, a Secondary Section may not explain any mathematics.)
     The relationship could be a matter of historical connection with
     the subject or with related matters, or of legal, commercial,
     philosophical, ethical or political position regarding them.

     The "Invariant Sections" are certain Secondary Sections whose
     titles are designated, as being those of Invariant Sections, in
     the notice that says that the Document is released under this
     License.

     The "Cover Texts" are certain short passages of text that are
     listed, as Front-Cover Texts or Back-Cover Texts, in the notice
     that says that the Document is released under this License.

     A "Transparent" copy of the Document means a machine-readable copy,
     represented in a format whose specification is available to the
     general public, whose contents can be viewed and edited directly
     and straightforwardly with generic text editors or (for images
     composed of pixels) generic paint programs or (for drawings) some
     widely available drawing editor, and that is suitable for input to
     text formatters or for automatic translation to a variety of
     formats suitable for input to text formatters.  A copy made in an
     otherwise Transparent file format whose markup has been designed
     to thwart or discourage subsequent modification by readers is not
     Transparent.  A copy that is not "Transparent" is called "Opaque".

     Examples of suitable formats for Transparent copies include plain
     ASCII without markup, Texinfo input format, LaTeX input format,
     SGML or XML using a publicly available DTD, and
     standard-conforming simple HTML designed for human modification.
     Opaque formats include PostScript, PDF, proprietary formats that
     can be read and edited only by proprietary word processors, SGML
     or XML for which the DTD and/or processing tools are not generally
     available, and the machine-generated HTML produced by some word
     processors for output purposes only.

     The "Title Page" means, for a printed book, the title page itself,
     plus such following pages as are needed to hold, legibly, the
     material this License requires to appear in the title page.  For
     works in formats which do not have any title page as such, "Title
     Page" means the text near the most prominent appearance of the
     work's title, preceding the beginning of the body of the text.

  2. VERBATIM COPYING

     You may copy and distribute the Document in any medium, either
     commercially or noncommercially, provided that this License, the
     copyright notices, and the license notice saying this License
     applies to the Document are reproduced in all copies, and that you
     add no other conditions whatsoever to those of this License.  You
     may not use technical measures to obstruct or control the reading
     or further copying of the copies you make or distribute.  However,
     you may accept compensation in exchange for copies.  If you
     distribute a large enough number of copies you must also follow
     the conditions in section 3.

     You may also lend copies, under the same conditions stated above,
     and you may publicly display copies.

  3. COPYING IN QUANTITY

     If you publish printed copies of the Document numbering more than
     100, and the Document's license notice requires Cover Texts, you
     must enclose the copies in covers that carry, clearly and legibly,
     all these Cover Texts: Front-Cover Texts on the front cover, and
     Back-Cover Texts on the back cover.  Both covers must also clearly
     and legibly identify you as the publisher of these copies.  The
     front cover must present the full title with all words of the
     title equally prominent and visible.  You may add other material
     on the covers in addition.  Copying with changes limited to the
     covers, as long as they preserve the title of the Document and
     satisfy these conditions, can be treated as verbatim copying in
     other respects.

     If the required texts for either cover are too voluminous to fit
     legibly, you should put the first ones listed (as many as fit
     reasonably) on the actual cover, and continue the rest onto
     adjacent pages.

     If you publish or distribute Opaque copies of the Document
     numbering more than 100, you must either include a
     machine-readable Transparent copy along with each Opaque copy, or
     state in or with each Opaque copy a publicly-accessible
     computer-network location containing a complete Transparent copy
     of the Document, free of added material, which the general
     network-using public has access to download anonymously at no
     charge using public-standard network protocols.  If you use the
     latter option, you must take reasonably prudent steps, when you
     begin distribution of Opaque copies in quantity, to ensure that
     this Transparent copy will remain thus accessible at the stated
     location until at least one year after the last time you
     distribute an Opaque copy (directly or through your agents or
     retailers) of that edition to the public.

     It is requested, but not required, that you contact the authors of
     the Document well before redistributing any large number of
     copies, to give them a chance to provide you with an updated
     version of the Document.

  4. MODIFICATIONS

     You may copy and distribute a Modified Version of the Document
     under the conditions of sections 2 and 3 above, provided that you
     release the Modified Version under precisely this License, with
     the Modified Version filling the role of the Document, thus
     licensing distribution and modification of the Modified Version to
     whoever possesses a copy of it.  In addition, you must do these
     things in the Modified Version:

       A. Use in the Title Page (and on the covers, if any) a title
          distinct from that of the Document, and from those of
          previous versions (which should, if there were any, be listed
          in the History section of the Document).  You may use the
          same title as a previous version if the original publisher of
          that version gives permission.

       B. List on the Title Page, as authors, one or more persons or
          entities responsible for authorship of the modifications in
          the Modified Version, together with at least five of the
          principal authors of the Document (all of its principal
          authors, if it has less than five).

       C. State on the Title page the name of the publisher of the
          Modified Version, as the publisher.

       D. Preserve all the copyright notices of the Document.

       E. Add an appropriate copyright notice for your modifications
          adjacent to the other copyright notices.

       F. Include, immediately after the copyright notices, a license
          notice giving the public permission to use the Modified
          Version under the terms of this License, in the form shown in
          the Addendum below.

       G. Preserve in that license notice the full lists of Invariant
          Sections and required Cover Texts given in the Document's
          license notice.

       H. Include an unaltered copy of this License.

       I. Preserve the section entitled "History", and its title, and
          add to it an item stating at least the title, year, new
          authors, and publisher of the Modified Version as given on
          the Title Page.  If there is no section entitled "History" in
          the Document, create one stating the title, year, authors,
          and publisher of the Document as given on its Title Page,
          then add an item describing the Modified Version as stated in
          the previous sentence.

       J. Preserve the network location, if any, given in the Document
          for public access to a Transparent copy of the Document, and
          likewise the network locations given in the Document for
          previous versions it was based on.  These may be placed in
          the "History" section.  You may omit a network location for a
          work that was published at least four years before the
          Document itself, or if the original publisher of the version
          it refers to gives permission.

       K. In any section entitled "Acknowledgments" or "Dedications",
          preserve the section's title, and preserve in the section all
          the substance and tone of each of the contributor
          acknowledgments and/or dedications given therein.

       L. Preserve all the Invariant Sections of the Document,
          unaltered in their text and in their titles.  Section numbers
          or the equivalent are not considered part of the section
          titles.

       M. Delete any section entitled "Endorsements".  Such a section
          may not be included in the Modified Version.

       N. Do not retitle any existing section as "Endorsements" or to
          conflict in title with any Invariant Section.

     If the Modified Version includes new front-matter sections or
     appendices that qualify as Secondary Sections and contain no
     material copied from the Document, you may at your option
     designate some or all of these sections as invariant.  To do this,
     add their titles to the list of Invariant Sections in the Modified
     Version's license notice.  These titles must be distinct from any
     other section titles.

     You may add a section entitled "Endorsements", provided it contains
     nothing but endorsements of your Modified Version by various
     parties--for example, statements of peer review or that the text
     has been approved by an organization as the authoritative
     definition of a standard.

     You may add a passage of up to five words as a Front-Cover Text,
     and a passage of up to 25 words as a Back-Cover Text, to the end
     of the list of Cover Texts in the Modified Version.  Only one
     passage of Front-Cover Text and one of Back-Cover Text may be
     added by (or through arrangements made by) any one entity.  If the
     Document already includes a cover text for the same cover,
     previously added by you or by arrangement made by the same entity
     you are acting on behalf of, you may not add another; but you may
     replace the old one, on explicit permission from the previous
     publisher that added the old one.

     The author(s) and publisher(s) of the Document do not by this
     License give permission to use their names for publicity for or to
     assert or imply endorsement of any Modified Version.

  5. COMBINING DOCUMENTS

     You may combine the Document with other documents released under
     this License, under the terms defined in section 4 above for
     modified versions, provided that you include in the combination
     all of the Invariant Sections of all of the original documents,
     unmodified, and list them all as Invariant Sections of your
     combined work in its license notice.

     The combined work need only contain one copy of this License, and
     multiple identical Invariant Sections may be replaced with a single
     copy.  If there are multiple Invariant Sections with the same name
     but different contents, make the title of each such section unique
     by adding at the end of it, in parentheses, the name of the
     original author or publisher of that section if known, or else a
     unique number.  Make the same adjustment to the section titles in
     the list of Invariant Sections in the license notice of the
     combined work.

     In the combination, you must combine any sections entitled
     "History" in the various original documents, forming one section
     entitled "History"; likewise combine any sections entitled
     "Acknowledgments", and any sections entitled "Dedications".  You
     must delete all sections entitled "Endorsements."

  6. COLLECTIONS OF DOCUMENTS

     You may make a collection consisting of the Document and other
     documents released under this License, and replace the individual
     copies of this License in the various documents with a single copy
     that is included in the collection, provided that you follow the
     rules of this License for verbatim copying of each of the
     documents in all other respects.

     You may extract a single document from such a collection, and
     distribute it individually under this License, provided you insert
     a copy of this License into the extracted document, and follow
     this License in all other respects regarding verbatim copying of
     that document.

  7. AGGREGATION WITH INDEPENDENT WORKS

     A compilation of the Document or its derivatives with other
     separate and independent documents or works, in or on a volume of
     a storage or distribution medium, does not as a whole count as a
     Modified Version of the Document, provided no compilation
     copyright is claimed for the compilation.  Such a compilation is
     called an "aggregate", and this License does not apply to the
     other self-contained works thus compiled with the Document, on
     account of their being thus compiled, if they are not themselves
     derivative works of the Document.

     If the Cover Text requirement of section 3 is applicable to these
     copies of the Document, then if the Document is less than one
     quarter of the entire aggregate, the Document's Cover Texts may be
     placed on covers that surround only the Document within the
     aggregate.  Otherwise they must appear on covers around the whole
     aggregate.

  8. TRANSLATION

     Translation is considered a kind of modification, so you may
     distribute translations of the Document under the terms of section
     4.  Replacing Invariant Sections with translations requires special
     permission from their copyright holders, but you may include
     translations of some or all Invariant Sections in addition to the
     original versions of these Invariant Sections.  You may include a
     translation of this License provided that you also include the
     original English version of this License.  In case of a
     disagreement between the translation and the original English
     version of this License, the original English version will prevail.

  9. TERMINATION

     You may not copy, modify, sublicense, or distribute the Document
     except as expressly provided for under this License.  Any other
     attempt to copy, modify, sublicense or distribute the Document is
     void, and will automatically terminate your rights under this
     License.  However, parties who have received copies, or rights,
     from you under this License will not have their licenses
     terminated so long as such parties remain in full compliance.

 10. FUTURE REVISIONS OF THIS LICENSE

     The Free Software Foundation may publish new, revised versions of
     the GNU Free Documentation License from time to time.  Such new
     versions will be similar in spirit to the present version, but may
     differ in detail to address new problems or concerns.  See
     `http://www.gnu.org/copyleft/'.

     Each version of the License is given a distinguishing version
     number.  If the Document specifies that a particular numbered
     version of this License "or any later version" applies to it, you
     have the option of following the terms and conditions either of
     that specified version or of any later version that has been
     published (not as a draft) by the Free Software Foundation.  If
     the Document does not specify a version number of this License,
     you may choose any version ever published (not as a draft) by the
     Free Software Foundation.

                      END OF TERMS AND CONDITIONS

 How to use this License for your documents
-------------------------------------------

To use this License in a document you have written, include a copy of
the License in the document and put the following copyright and license
notices just after the title page:

       Copyright (C)  YEAR  YOUR NAME.
       Permission is granted to copy, distribute and/or modify this document
       under the terms of the GNU Free Documentation License, Version 1.1
       or any later version published by the Free Software Foundation;
       with the Invariant Sections being LIST THEIR TITLES, with the
       Front-Cover Texts being LIST, and with the Back-Cover Texts being LIST.
       A copy of the license is included in the section entitled ``GNU
       Free Documentation License''.

If you have no Invariant Sections, write "with no Invariant Sections"
instead of saying which ones are invariant.  If you have no Front-Cover
Texts, write "no Front-Cover Texts" instead of "Front-Cover Texts being
LIST"; likewise for Back-Cover Texts.

If your document contains nontrivial examples of program code, we
recommend releasing these examples in parallel under your choice of
free software license, such as the GNU General Public License, to
permit their use in free software.

 Indices
********

 Index of Concepts
==================

administrative utilities:                      See 3.5.3.    (line 1454)
Architectures:                                 See 5.2.3.    (line 2281)
authors:
          See ``Authors''.                                   (line  320)
binary debs <1>:                               See 6.5.2.    (line 4939)
binary debs <2>:                               See 6.4.2.    (line 4892)
binary debs <3>:                               See 6.2.2.    (line 3537)
binary debs:                                   See 6.1.2.    (line 3089)
binary rpms <1>:                               See 6.5.1.    (line 4928)
binary rpms <2>:                               See 6.4.1.    (line 4862)
binary rpms <3>:                               See 6.2.1.    (line 3441)
binary rpms:                                   See 6.1.1.    (line 2954)
bug reports, automatic generation:             See 7.2.3.    (line 6086)
bug reports, generating:                       See 7.2.2.    (line 6030)
bug reports, stand along generation:           See 7.2.4.    (line 6133)
bugs:                                          See 5.5.      (line 2586)
bugs, history:                                 See 5.5.3.    (line 2624)
bugs, known:                                   See 5.5.2.    (line 2616)
bugs, reporting:                               See 7.2.      (line 5969)
building:                                      See 6.3.      (line 4584)
building, source dscs:                         See 6.3.2.    (line 4624)
building, source srpm:                         See 6.3.1.    (line 4587)
building, tar ball:                            See 6.3.3.    (line 4665)
checkout, cvs:                                 See 6.1.6.    (line 3305)
compatibility <1>:                             See 5.2.      (line 2144)
compatibility:                                 See 4.1.      (line 1961)
configuration:                                 See 6.2.      (line 3438)
configure environment variables:               See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4370)
configure options:                             See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3915)
configuring, binary debs:                      See 6.2.2.    (line 3537)
configuring, binary rpms:                      See 6.2.1.    (line 3441)
configuring, source dscs:                      See 6.2.4.    (line 3892)
configuring, source srpm:                      See 6.2.3.    (line 3548)
configuring, tar ball:                         See 6.2.5.    (line 3907)
conformance:                                   See 4.        (line 1958)
conformance test programs:                     See 3.5.5.    (line 1626)
contributors:
          See ``Contributors''.                              (line  303)
conventions:                                   See 1.3.      (line  771)
credits:
          See ``Acknowledgements''.                          (line  274)
cvs:                                           See 6.1.6.    (line 3305)
definitions:                                   See 1.3.      (line  771)
developing:                                    See 3.6.      (line 1734)
downloading:                                   See 6.1.      (line 2929)
downloading, binary rpms:                      See 6.1.1.    (line 2954)
downloading, debian debs:                      See 6.1.2.    (line 3089)
downloading, debian dscs:                      See 6.1.4.    (line 3238)
downloading, source srpm:                      See 6.1.3.    (line 3221)
downloading, tar ball:                         See 6.1.5.    (line 3256)
drivers:                                       See 3.2.      (line 1145)
generating bug reports <1>:                    See 7.2.4.    (line 6133)
generating bug reports:                        See 7.2.2.    (line 6030)
generating bug reports automatically:          See 7.2.3.    (line 6086)
generating problem reports:                    See 7.2.2.    (line 6030)
generating problem reports automatically:      See 7.2.3.    (line 6086)
generating problem reports stand alone:        See 7.2.4.    (line 6133)
GNU/Linux Distributions:                       See 5.2.1.    (line 2149)
headers:                                       See 3.1.      (line 1032)
history:                                       See 5.7.      (line 2920)
history bugs:                                  See 5.5.3.    (line 2624)
indices:
          See ``Indices''.                                   (line 7470)
init scripts:                                  See 3.5.1.    (line 1368)
installation:                                  See 6.        (line 2926)
installing:                                    See 6.4.      (line 4859)
installing, binary debs:                       See 6.4.2.    (line 4892)
installing, binary rpms:                       See 6.4.1.    (line 4862)
installing, tar ball:                          See 6.4.3.    (line 4907)
introduction:                                  See 1.        (line  745)
Kernel:                                        See 5.2.2.    (line 2246)
known bugs:                                    See 5.5.2.    (line 2616)
known problems:                                See 7.3.      (line 6177)
libraries:                                     See 3.4.      (line 1362)
license, FDL:
          See ``GNU Free Documentation License''.            (line 7081)
license, GNU Free Documentation License:
          See ``GNU Free Documentation License''.            (line 7081)
license, GNU General Public License:
          See ``GNU General Public License''.                (line 6196)
license, GPL:
          See ``GNU General Public License''.                (line 6196)
license, Lesser General Public License:
          See ``GNU Lesser General Public License''.         (line 6557)
license, LGPL:
          See ``GNU Lesser General Public License''.         (line 6557)
licenses:
          See ``Licenses''.                                  (line 6193)
licensing:
          See ``Notice''.                                    (line   42)
Linux STREAMS:                                 See 5.2.4.    (line 2303)
loading:                                       See 6.6.      (line 4995)
loading kernel modules:                        See 6.6.2.    (line 5051)
maintainer:
          See ``Maintainer''.                                (line  330)
manual abstract:
          See ``Abstract''.                                  (line   59)
manual audience:
          See ``Audience''.                                  (line   95)
manual disclaimer:
          See ``Disclaimer''.                                (line  232)
manual intent:
          See ``Intent''.                                    (line   83)
manual notice:
          See ``Notice''.                                    (line   42)
manual objective:
          See ``Objective''.                                 (line   65)
manual revisions:
          See ``Revisions''.                                 (line  112)
maturity:                                      See 5.4.      (line 2475)
modules:                                       See 3.3.      (line 1277)
NexusWare:                                     See 6.6.2.    (line 5051)
objective:                                     See 2.        (line  776)
organization:                                  See 1.2.      (line  758)
overview:                                      See 1.1.      (line  752)
performance test programs:                     See 3.5.4.    (line 1610)
porting:                                       See 4.2.      (line 2019)
post-installation checks:                      See 7.1.2.    (line 5894)
pre-installation checks:                       See 7.1.1.    (line 5667)
prerequisites:                                 See 5.1.      (line 2104)
problem reports:                               See 7.2.      (line 5969)
problems, known:                               See 7.3.      (line 6177)
quick start guide:
          See ``Quick Start Guide''.                         (line  472)
reference:                                     See 3.        (line 1029)
release notes:                                 See 5.3.      (line 2310)
release streams-0.7a-1:                        See 5.3.      (line 2439)
release streams-0.7a-2:                        See 5.3.      (line 2427)
release streams-0.7a-3:                        See 5.3.      (line 2420)
release streams-0.7a.3:                        See 5.3.      (line 2402)
release streams-0.7a.4:                        See 5.3.      (line 2396)
release streams-0.7a.5:                        See 5.3.      (line 2366)
release streams-0.7a.6.rc2:                    See 5.3.      (line 2341)
release streams-0.7a.6.rc3:                    See 5.3.      (line 2316)
release streams-0.7a.6rc1:                     See 5.3.      (line 2355)
releases:                                      See 5.        (line 2091)
removing:                                      See 6.5.      (line 4925)
removing, binary debs:                         See 6.5.2.    (line 4939)
removing, binary rpms:                         See 6.5.1.    (line 4928)
removing, source dscs:                         See 6.5.4.    (line 4961)
removing, source srpm:                         See 6.5.3.    (line 4950)
removing, tar ball:                            See 6.5.5.    (line 4975)
reporting bugs:                                See 7.2.      (line 5969)
schedule:                                      See 5.6.      (line 2668)
source dscs <1>:                               See 6.5.4.    (line 4961)
source dscs <2>:                               See 6.3.2.    (line 4624)
source dscs <3>:                               See 6.2.4.    (line 3892)
source dscs:                                   See 6.1.4.    (line 3238)
source rpms <1>:                               See 6.5.3.    (line 4950)
source rpms <2>:                               See 6.3.1.    (line 4587)
source rpms <3>:                               See 6.2.3.    (line 3548)
source rpms:                                   See 6.1.3.    (line 3221)
sponsors:
          See ``Sponsors''.                                  (line  281)
streams-core-2.6.13-15.8-default-0.7a.6.rc3-1.10.0.i686.rpm:See 6.2.1.
                                                             (line 3447)
streams-dev-0.7a.6.rc3-1.10.0.i686.rpm:        See 6.2.1.    (line 3461)
streams-devel-0.7a.6.rc3-1.10.0.i686.rpm:      See 6.2.1.    (line 3464)
streams-doc-0.7a.6.rc3-1.10.0.i686.rpm:        See 6.2.1.    (line 3472)
streams-info-2.6.13-15.8-default-0.7a.6.rc3-1.10.0.i686.rpm:See 6.2.1.
                                                             (line 3453)
streams-lib-0.7a.6.rc3-1.10.0.i686.rpm:        See 6.2.1.    (line 3486)
streams-source-0.7a.6.rc3-1.10.0.i686.rpm:     See 6.2.1.    (line 3497)
streams-util-0.7a.6.rc3-1.10.0.i686.rpm:       See 6.2.1.    (line 3502)
tar ball <1>:                                  See 6.5.5.    (line 4975)
tar ball <2>:                                  See 6.4.3.    (line 4907)
tar ball <3>:                                  See 6.3.3.    (line 4665)
tar ball <4>:                                  See 6.2.5.    (line 3907)
tar ball:                                      See 6.1.5.    (line 3256)
test suites:                                   See 7.1.      (line 5664)
test suites, running:                          See 7.1.2.1.  (line 5909)
troubleshooting:                               See 7.        (line 5661)
user utilities:                                See 3.5.2.    (line 1395)
utilities:                                     See 3.5.      (line 1365)
web resources:
          See ``Web Resources''.                             (line  341)
 Index of Data Types
====================

module_info(9):                                See 3.3.      (line 1309)
module_stat(9):                                See 3.3.      (line 1309)
 Index of Functions and Macros
==============================

 Index of Variables and Constants
=================================

AUTOM4TE:                                      See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4565)
AUTOTEST:                                      See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4570)
BZIP2:                                         See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4425)
BZIP2_CMD:                                     See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4428)
CHKCONFIG:                                     See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4439)
DEB_BUILD_ARCH:                                See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4469)
DEB_BUILD_GNU_CPU:                             See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4473)
DEB_BUILD_GNU_SYSTEM:                          See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4477)
DEB_BUILD_GNU_TYPE:                            See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4481)
DEB_HOST_ARCH:                                 See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4485)
DEB_HOST_GNU_CPU:                              See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4489)
DEB_HOST_GNU_SYSTEM:                           See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4493)
DEB_HOST_GNU_TYPE:                             See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4497)
DEPMOD:                                        See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4513)
DESTDIR:                                       See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4506)
DPKG:                                          See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4455)
DPKG_BUILDPACKAGE:                             See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4464)
DPKG_SOURCE:                                   See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4459)
GENKSYMS:                                      See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4539)
GNUPGHOME:                                     See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4381)
GNUPGUSER:                                     See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4377)
GPG:                                           See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4373)
GPGPASSWD:                                     See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4385)
GZIP:                                          See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4415)
GZIP_CMD:                                      See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4418)
KGENKSYMS:                                     See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4544)
LDCONFIG:                                      See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4501)
LSMOD:                                         See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4525)
LSOF:                                          See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4531)
MAKEWHATIS:                                    See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4434)
MODPOST_CACHE:                                 See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4559)
MODPROBE:                                      See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4519)
NM:                                            See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4554)
OBJDUMP:                                       See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4549)
PACKAGE_KVERSION:                              See 6.2.3.    (line 3613)
PIC:                                           See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4409)
REFER:                                         See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4397)
RPM:                                           See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4445)
RPMBUILD:                                      See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4449)
SOELIM:                                        See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4391)
TBL:                                           See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4403)
 Index of Files and Programs
============================

/etc/init.d/specfs:                            See 3.5.1.    (line 1371)
/etc/init.d/specfs.sh:                         See 3.5.1.    (line 1372)
/etc/init.d/streams:                           See 3.5.1.    (line 1382)
/etc/init.d/streams.sh:                        See 3.5.1.    (line 1383)
/lib/modules/2.6.13-15.8-default/streams/:     See 6.6.1.1.  (line 5019)
/usr/bin/strchg:                               See 3.5.2.    (line 1398)
/usr/bin/strconf:                              See 3.5.2.    (line 1417)
/usr/bin/strreset:                             See 3.5.2.    (line 1437)
/usr/include/streams/log.h:                    See 3.6.1.    (line 1767)
/usr/include/streams/loop.h:                   See 3.6.1.    (line 1772)
/usr/include/streams/sad.h:                    See 3.6.1.    (line 1777)
/usr/include/streams/strlog.h:                 See 3.6.1.    (line 1757)
/usr/include/streams/stropts.h:                See 3.6.1.    (line 1762)
/usr/include/streams/sys/cmn_err.h:            See 3.6.1.    (line 1782)
/usr/include/streams/sys/ddi.h:                See 3.6.1.    (line 1786)
/usr/include/streams/sys/debug.h:              See 3.6.1.    (line 1792)
/usr/include/streams/sys/dki.h:                See 3.6.1.    (line 1797)
/usr/include/streams/sys/kmem.h:               See 3.6.1.    (line 1803)
/usr/include/streams/sys/log.h:                See 3.6.1.    (line 1849)
/usr/include/streams/sys/loop.h:               See 3.6.1.    (line 1855)
/usr/include/streams/sys/sad.h:                See 3.6.1.    (line 1861)
/usr/include/streams/sys/sc.h:                 See 3.6.1.    (line 1867)
/usr/include/streams/sys/strconf.h:            See 3.6.1.    (line 1809)
/usr/include/streams/sys/strdebug.h:           See 3.6.1.    (line 1814)
/usr/include/streams/sys/stream.h:             See 3.6.1.    (line 1819)
/usr/include/streams/sys/strlog.h:             See 3.6.1.    (line 1825)
/usr/include/streams/sys/stropts.h:            See 3.6.1.    (line 1831)
/usr/include/streams/sys/stropts32.h:          See 3.6.1.    (line 1837)
/usr/include/streams/sys/strsubr.h:            See 3.6.1.    (line 1843)
/usr/include/streams/sys/testmod.h:            See 3.6.1.    (line 1873)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-clone:               See 3.5.5.    (line 1629)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-connld:              See 3.5.5.    (line 1636)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-echo:                See 3.5.5.    (line 1643)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-fifo:                See 3.5.5.    (line 1650)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-log:                 See 3.5.5.    (line 1657)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-loop:                See 3.5.5.    (line 1664)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-mux:                 See 3.5.5.    (line 1671)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-nsdev:               See 3.5.5.    (line 1678)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-nuls:                See 3.5.5.    (line 1685)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-pipe:                See 3.5.5.    (line 1692)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-pipemod:             See 3.5.5.    (line 1699)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-sad:                 See 3.5.5.    (line 1706)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-sc:                  See 3.5.5.    (line 1713)
/usr/libexec/streams/test-streams:             See 3.5.5.    (line 1720)
/usr/sbin/autopush:                            See 3.5.3.    (line 1458)
/usr/sbin/fattach:                             See 3.5.3.    (line 1471)
/usr/sbin/fdetach:                             See 3.5.3.    (line 1488)
/usr/sbin/insf:                                See 3.5.3.    (line 1500)
/usr/sbin/perftest:                            See 3.5.4.    (line 1613)
/usr/sbin/perftestn:                           See 3.5.4.    (line 1618)
/usr/sbin/scls:                                See 3.5.3.    (line 1508)
/usr/sbin/strace:                              See 3.5.3.    (line 1520)
/usr/sbin/strclean:                            See 3.5.3.    (line 1535)
/usr/sbin/streams_mknod:                       See 3.5.3.    (line 1544)
/usr/sbin/strerr:                              See 3.5.3.    (line 1555)
/usr/sbin/strinfo:                             See 3.5.3.    (line 1570)
/usr/sbin/strload:                             See 3.5.3.    (line 1587)
/usr/sbin/strsetup:                            See 3.5.3.    (line 1597)
/usr/sbin/strvf:                               See 3.5.3.    (line 1602)
autopush:                                      See 3.5.3.    (line 1458)
clone:                                         See 3.2.      (line 1153)
echo:                                          See 3.2.      (line 1160)
fattach:                                       See 3.5.3.    (line 1471)
fdetach:                                       See 3.5.3.    (line 1488)
fifo:                                          See 3.2.      (line 1170)
insf:                                          See 3.5.3.    (line 1500)
log:                                           See 3.2.      (line 1181)
log.h:                                         See 3.6.1.    (line 1767)
loop:                                          See 3.2.      (line 1193)
loop.h:                                        See 3.6.1.    (line 1772)
mux:                                           See 3.2.      (line 1202)
nsdev:                                         See 3.2.      (line 1213)
nuls:                                          See 3.2.      (line 1223)
perftest:                                      See 3.5.4.    (line 1613)
perftestn:                                     See 3.5.4.    (line 1618)
pipe:                                          See 3.2.      (line 1231)
sad:                                           See 3.2.      (line 1240)
sad.h:                                         See 3.6.1.    (line 1777)
scls:                                          See 3.5.3.    (line 1508)
sfx:                                           See 3.2.      (line 1249)
specfs <1>:                                    See 3.5.1.    (line 1371)
specfs:                                        See 3.1.      (line 1037)
specfs.sh:                                     See 3.5.1.    (line 1372)
spx:                                           See 3.2.      (line 1257)
strace:                                        See 3.5.3.    (line 1520)
strchg:                                        See 3.5.2.    (line 1398)
strclean:                                      See 3.5.3.    (line 1535)
strconf:                                       See 3.5.2.    (line 1417)
streams <1>:                                   See 3.5.1.    (line 1382)
streams <2>:                                   See 3.2.      (line 1153)
streams:                                       See 3.1.      (line 1041)
streams-bufmod <1>:                            See 3.3.      (line 1317)
streams-bufmod:                                See 3.1.      (line 1098)
streams-connld <1>:                            See 3.3.      (line 1293)
streams-connld:                                See 3.1.      (line 1118)
streams-echo <1>:                              See 3.2.      (line 1160)
streams-echo:                                  See 3.1.      (line 1061)
streams-fifo <1>:                              See 3.2.      (line 1170)
streams-fifo:                                  See 3.1.      (line 1046)
streams-log <1>:                               See 3.2.      (line 1181)
streams-log:                                   See 3.1.      (line 1079)
streams-loop <1>:                              See 3.2.      (line 1193)
streams-loop:                                  See 3.1.      (line 1083)
streams-mux <1>:                               See 3.2.      (line 1202)
streams-mux:                                   See 3.1.      (line 1066)
streams-nsdev <1>:                             See 3.2.      (line 1213)
streams-nsdev:                                 See 3.1.      (line 1056)
streams-nullmod <1>:                           See 3.3.      (line 1329)
streams-nullmod:                               See 3.1.      (line 1105)
streams-nuls <1>:                              See 3.2.      (line 1223)
streams-nuls:                                  See 3.1.      (line 1071)
streams-pipe <1>:                              See 3.2.      (line 1231)
streams-pipe:                                  See 3.1.      (line 1075)
streams-pipemod <1>:                           See 3.3.      (line 1285)
streams-pipemod:                               See 3.1.      (line 1113)
streams-sad <1>:                               See 3.2.      (line 1240)
streams-sad:                                   See 3.1.      (line 1051)
streams-sc <1>:                                See 3.3.      (line 1304)
streams-sc:                                    See 3.1.      (line 1123)
streams-sfx <1>:                               See 3.2.      (line 1249)
streams-sfx:                                   See 3.1.      (line 1088)
streams-spx <1>:                               See 3.2.      (line 1257)
streams-spx:                                   See 3.1.      (line 1093)
streams-testmod <1>:                           See 3.3.      (line 1340)
streams-testmod:                               See 3.1.      (line 1128)
streams.sh:                                    See 3.5.1.    (line 1383)
streams_mknod:                                 See 3.5.3.    (line 1544)
strerr:                                        See 3.5.3.    (line 1555)
strinfo:                                       See 3.5.3.    (line 1570)
strload:                                       See 3.5.3.    (line 1587)
strlog.h:                                      See 3.6.1.    (line 1757)
stropts.h:                                     See 3.6.1.    (line 1762)
strreset:                                      See 3.5.2.    (line 1437)
strsetup:                                      See 3.5.3.    (line 1597)
strvf:                                         See 3.5.3.    (line 1602)
sys/cmn_err.h:                                 See 3.6.1.    (line 1782)
sys/ddi.h:                                     See 3.6.1.    (line 1786)
sys/debug.h:                                   See 3.6.1.    (line 1792)
sys/dki.h:                                     See 3.6.1.    (line 1797)
sys/kmem.h:                                    See 3.6.1.    (line 1803)
sys/log.h:                                     See 3.6.1.    (line 1849)
sys/loop.h:                                    See 3.6.1.    (line 1855)
sys/sad.h:                                     See 3.6.1.    (line 1861)
sys/sc.h:                                      See 3.6.1.    (line 1867)
sys/strconf.h:                                 See 3.6.1.    (line 1809)
sys/strdebug.h:                                See 3.6.1.    (line 1814)
sys/stream.h:                                  See 3.6.1.    (line 1819)
sys/strlog.h:                                  See 3.6.1.    (line 1825)
sys/stropts.h:                                 See 3.6.1.    (line 1831)
sys/stropts32.h:                               See 3.6.1.    (line 1837)
sys/strsubr.h:                                 See 3.6.1.    (line 1843)
sys/testmod.h:                                 See 3.6.1.    (line 1873)
test-clone:                                    See 3.5.5.    (line 1629)
test-connld:                                   See 3.5.5.    (line 1636)
test-echo:                                     See 3.5.5.    (line 1643)
test-fifo:                                     See 3.5.5.    (line 1650)
test-log:                                      See 3.5.5.    (line 1657)
test-loop:                                     See 3.5.5.    (line 1664)
test-mux:                                      See 3.5.5.    (line 1671)
test-nsdev:                                    See 3.5.5.    (line 1678)
test-nuls:                                     See 3.5.5.    (line 1685)
test-pipe:                                     See 3.5.5.    (line 1692)
test-pipemod:                                  See 3.5.5.    (line 1699)
test-sad:                                      See 3.5.5.    (line 1706)
test-sc:                                       See 3.5.5.    (line 1713)
test-streams:                                  See 3.5.5.    (line 1720)
 Index of Configuration Options
===============================

arch:                                          See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3989)
base-major:                                    See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4217)
big-compile <1>:                               See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4243)
big-compile:                                   See 6.2.3.    (line 3755)
checks <1>:                                    See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3919)
checks:                                        See 6.2.3.    (line 3624)
compress-manpages:                             See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3931)
cooked-manpages <1>:                           See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4076)
cooked-manpages:                               See 6.2.3.    (line 3644)
deb-epoch:                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4108)
deb-release:                                   See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4113)
deb-topdir:                                    See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4118)
devel <1>:                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3963)
devel:                                         See 6.2.3.    (line 3707)
devfs:                                         See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4034)
driver-clone <1>:                              See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4286)
driver-clone:                                  See 6.2.3.    (line 3798)
driver-echo <1>:                               See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4293)
driver-echo:                                   See 6.2.3.    (line 3805)
driver-fifo <1>:                               See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4298)
driver-fifo:                                   See 6.2.3.    (line 3810)
driver-log <1>:                                See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4303)
driver-log:                                    See 6.2.3.    (line 3815)
driver-loop <1>:                               See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4308)
driver-loop:                                   See 6.2.3.    (line 3820)
driver-mux <1>:                                See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4318)
driver-mux:                                    See 6.2.3.    (line 3830)
driver-nsdev <1>:                              See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4313)
driver-nsdev:                                  See 6.2.3.    (line 3825)
driver-nuls <1>:                               See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4323)
driver-nuls:                                   See 6.2.3.    (line 3835)
driver-pipe <1>:                               See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4328)
driver-pipe:                                   See 6.2.3.    (line 3840)
driver-sad <1>:                                See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4333)
driver-sad:                                    See 6.2.3.    (line 3845)
driver-sfx <1>:                                See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4338)
driver-sfx:                                    See 6.2.3.    (line 3850)
driver-spx <1>:                                See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4343)
driver-spx:                                    See 6.2.3.    (line 3855)
gpg-home:                                      See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4050)
gpg-user:                                      See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4043)
indep:                                         See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3996)
initscripts:                                   See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3949)
k-archdir:                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4181)
k-build:                                       See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4151)
k-config:                                      See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4195)
k-debug <1>:                                   See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4024)
k-debug:                                       See 6.2.3.    (line 3658)
k-inline <1>:                                  See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4003)
k-inline:                                      See 6.2.3.    (line 3681)
k-linkage:                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4133)
k-machdir:                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4188)
k-modules:                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4141)
k-modversions:                                 See 6.2.3.    (line 3691)
k-optimize <1>:                                See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4203)
k-optimize:                                    See 6.2.3.    (line 3637)
k-release <1>:                                 See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4125)
k-release:                                     See 6.2.3.    (line 3613)
k-safe <1>:                                    See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4009)
k-safe:                                        See 6.2.3.    (line 3674)
k-sysmap:                                      See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4167)
k-test <1>:                                    See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4016)
k-test:                                        See 6.2.3.    (line 3666)
module-bufmod <1>:                             See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4256)
module-bufmod:                                 See 6.2.3.    (line 3768)
module-connld <1>:                             See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4271)
module-connld:                                 See 6.2.3.    (line 3783)
module-nullmod <1>:                            See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4261)
module-nullmod:                                See 6.2.3.    (line 3773)
module-pipemod <1>:                            See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4266)
module-pipemod:                                See 6.2.3.    (line 3778)
module-sc <1>:                                 See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4276)
module-sc:                                     See 6.2.3.    (line 3788)
module-sth <1>:                                See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4249)
module-sth:                                    See 6.2.3.    (line 3761)
module-testmod <1>:                            See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4281)
module-testmod:                                See 6.2.3.    (line 3793)
modules <1>:                                   See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3981)
modules:                                       See 6.2.3.    (line 3726)
pkg-distdir:                                   See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4070)
pkg-epoch:                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4055)
pkg-release:                                   See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4062)
public <1>:                                    See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3938)
public:                                        See 6.2.3.    (line 3652)
rpm-epoch:                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4084)
rpm-extra:                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4094)
rpm-release:                                   See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4089)
rpm-topdir:                                    See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4101)
strconf-master:                                See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4213)
streams-bcm <1>:                               See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4353)
streams-bcm:                                   See 6.2.3.    (line 3865)
streams-fifos <1>:                             See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4348)
streams-fifos:                                 See 6.2.3.    (line 3860)
streams-kthreads <1>:                          See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4230)
streams-kthreads:                              See 6.2.3.    (line 3742)
streams-syncqs <1>:                            See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4225)
streams-syncqs:                                See 6.2.3.    (line 3737)
streams-utils <1>:                             See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4238)
streams-utils:                                 See 6.2.3.    (line 3750)
tools <1>:                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3971)
tools:                                         See 6.2.3.    (line 3716)
 Index of Makefile Targets
==========================

all <1>:                                       See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5091)
all:                                           See 6.6.1.    (line 5000)
check:                                         See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5113)
check-clean:                                   See 6.7.1.3.  (line 5298)
check.log:                                     See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5387)
clean:                                         See 6.7.1.3.  (line 5259)
compile.log:                                   See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5383)
csig:                                          See 6.7.1.9.  (line 5652)
debs:                                          See 6.7.1.9.  (line 5642)
dist:                                          See 6.7.1.2.  (line 5224)
dist.log:                                      See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5415)
distcheck:                                     See 6.7.1.2.  (line 5234)
distcheck.log:                                 See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5419)
distclean:                                     See 6.7.1.3.  (line 5270)
dsc:                                           See 6.7.1.9.  (line 5624)
forced-release:                                See 6.7.1.4.  (line 5332)
forced-release-sign:                           See 6.7.1.4.  (line 5349)
install <1>:                                   See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5135)
install:                                       See 6.6.1.    (line 5000)
install-strip <1>:                             See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5135)
install-strip:                                 See 6.6.1.    (line 5000)
install.log:                                   See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5391)
installcheck:                                  See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5146)
installcheck.log:                              See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5395)
maintainer-clean:                              See 6.7.1.3.  (line 5282)
mostlyclean:                                   See 6.7.1.3.  (line 5251)
pr <1>:                                        See 7.2.2.    (line 6050)
pr:                                            See 6.7.1.6.  (line 5465)
rebuild:                                       See 6.7.1.8.  (line 5594)
rebuild.log:                                   See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5428)
release:                                       See 6.7.1.4.  (line 5321)
release-archives:                              See 6.7.1.7.  (line 5502)
release-clean:                                 See 6.7.1.4.  (line 5357)
release-clean-archives:                        See 6.7.1.7.  (line 5539)
release-sign:                                  See 6.7.1.4.  (line 5340)
release-sign-archives:                         See 6.7.1.7.  (line 5519)
release-sign.log:                              See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5440)
release.log:                                   See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5436)
remove:                                        See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5194)
remove.log:                                    See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5405)
resign:                                        See 6.7.1.8.  (line 5604)
resign.log:                                    See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5432)
retest:                                        See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5163)
rpms:                                          See 6.7.1.8.  (line 5566)
send-pr:                                       See 6.7.1.6.  (line 5477)
sign:                                          See 6.7.1.8.  (line 5583)
sigs:                                          See 6.7.1.9.  (line 5635)
srpm:                                          See 6.7.1.8.  (line 5558)
srpm-sign:                                     See 6.7.1.8.  (line 5583)
srpm.log:                                      See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5424)
uninstall:                                     See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5178)
uninstall.log:                                 See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5400)
 Index of Authors
=================

Bidulock, Brian:
          See ``Authors''.                                   (line  322)
 Index of Manual Pages Referenced
=================================

autoconf(1) <1>:                               See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5148)
autoconf(1) <2>:                               See 6.3.3.2.  (line 4690)
autoconf(1) <3>:                               See 6.2.5.    (line 3907)
autoconf(1) <4>:                               See 6.1.6.    (line 3342)
autoconf(1) <5>:                               See 6.1.5.    (line 3262)
autoconf(1) <6>:                               See 6.1.2.    (line 3135)
autoconf(1) <7>:                               See 6.1.1.    (line 2999)
autoconf(1):
          See ``Release''.                                   (line  508)
autom4te(1):                                   See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4566)
automake(1) <1>:                               See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5371)
automake(1) <2>:                               See 6.7.1.3.  (line 5255)
automake(1) <3>:                               See 6.7.1.2.  (line 5230)
automake(1) <4>:                               See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5109)
automake(1) <5>:                               See 6.7.1.    (line 5075)
automake(1) <6>:                               See 6.6.1.    (line 5000)
automake(1) <7>:                               See 6.5.5.    (line 4976)
automake(1) <8>:                               See 6.4.3.    (line 4908)
automake(1) <9>:                               See 6.3.3.3.  (line 4751)
automake(1) <10>:                              See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3975)
automake(1) <11>:                              See 6.2.3.    (line 3626)
automake(1):                                   See 6.1.6.    (line 3342)
autopush(8) <1>:                               See 3.5.3.    (line 1457)
autopush(8):                                   See 3.2.      (line 1241)
autoreconf(1):                                 See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5094)
bufmod(4) <1>:                                 See 3.3.      (line 1316)
bufmod(4):                                     See 3.1.      (line 1102)
bzip2(1):                                      See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4429)
chkconfig(8):                                  See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4440)
clone(4) <1>:                                  See 3.5.5.    (line 1630)
clone(4):                                      See 3.2.      (line 1152)
cmn_err(9):                                    See 3.6.1.    (line 1782)
connld(4) <1>:                                 See 3.5.5.    (line 1637)
connld(4) <2>:                                 See 3.5.3.    (line 1476)
connld(4) <3>:                                 See 3.3.      (line 1292)
connld(4):                                     See 3.1.      (line 1119)
cvs(1) <1>:                                    See 6.1.6.    (line 3323)
cvs(1):
          See ``Release''.                                   (line  523)
DDI(9):                                        See 3.6.1.    (line 1787)
depmod(8):                                     See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4514)
devfsd(1):                                     See 6.2.3.    (line 3700)
devfsd(8):                                     See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4036)
DKI(9):                                        See 3.6.1.    (line 1798)
dpkg(1) <1>:                                   See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5138)
dpkg(1) <2>:                                   See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4456)
dpkg(1) <3>:                                   See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3975)
dpkg(1) <4>:                                   See 6.1.6.    (line 3381)
dpkg(1) <5>:                                   See 6.1.5.    (line 3265)
dpkg(1) <6>:                                   See 6.1.      (line 2941)
dpkg(1):
          See ``Linux Fast-STREAMS''.                        (line  493)
dpkg(8) <1>:                                   See 6.5.2.    (line 4945)
dpkg(8):                                       See 6.4.2.    (line 4896)
dpkg-buildpackage(1):                          See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4465)
dpkg-source(1):                                See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4460)
echo(4) <1>:                                   See 3.5.5.    (line 1644)
echo(4) <2>:                                   See 3.2.      (line 1159)
echo(4):                                       See 3.1.      (line 1063)
fattach(3) <1>:                                See 3.5.3.    (line 1476)
fattach(3):                                    See 3.3.      (line 1295)
fattach(8):                                    See 3.5.3.    (line 1470)
fdetach(8):                                    See 3.5.3.    (line 1487)
fifo(4) <1>:                                   See 3.5.5.    (line 1651)
fifo(4) <2>:                                   See 3.2.      (line 1169)
fifo(4):                                       See 3.1.      (line 1048)
gcc(1):
          See ``Prerequisites''.                             (line  576)
genksyms(8) <1>:                               See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4540)
genksyms(8):                                   See 6.1.6.    (line 3378)
git(1):
          See ``Release''.                                   (line  523)
gpg(1):                                        See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4043)
grefer(1) <1>:                                 See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4076)
grefer(1) <2>:                                 See 6.2.3.    (line 3644)
grefer(1):                                     See 6.1.6.    (line 3370)
groff(1) <1>:                                  See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4079)
groff(1) <2>:                                  See 6.2.3.    (line 3646)
groff(1):                                      See 6.1.6.    (line 3369)
gzip(1):                                       See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4419)
I_FLUSH:                                       See 3.5.2.    (line 1443)
I_RECVFD(7):                                   See 3.3.      (line 1298)
init_install(8):                               See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4441)
init_remove(8):                                See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4442)
insf(8):                                       See 3.5.3.    (line 1499)
insmod(8):                                     See 6.3.3.3.  (line 4792)
kmem_alloc(9):                                 See 3.6.1.    (line 1803)
ldconfig(8):                                   See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4502)
log(4) <1>:                                    See 3.6.1.    (line 1759)
log(4) <2>:                                    See 3.5.5.    (line 1658)
log(4) <3>:                                    See 3.5.3.    (line 1524)
log(4) <4>:                                    See 3.2.      (line 1180)
log(4):                                        See 3.1.      (line 1080)
loop(4) <1>:                                   See 3.6.1.    (line 1772)
loop(4) <2>:                                   See 3.5.5.    (line 1665)
loop(4) <3>:                                   See 3.2.      (line 1192)
loop(4):                                       See 3.1.      (line 1085)
lsmod(8):                                      See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4526)
lsof(1):                                       See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4532)
M_ERROR(9):                                    See 3.3.      (line 1343)
M_FLUSH(9) <1>:                                See 3.5.2.    (line 1441)
M_FLUSH(9):                                    See 3.3.      (line 1287)
M_HANGUP(9):                                   See 3.3.      (line 1343)
M_IOCTL(9):                                    See 3.3.      (line 1346)
M_PASSFP(9):                                   See 3.3.      (line 1298)
make(1) <1>:                                   See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3921)
make(1):                                       See 6.1.6.    (line 3412)
makewhatis(8):                                 See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4435)
modpost(1):                                    See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4560)
modprobe(8):                                   See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4520)
mux(4) <1>:                                    See 3.5.5.    (line 1672)
mux(4) <2>:                                    See 3.2.      (line 1201)
mux(4):                                        See 3.1.      (line 1068)
nm(1):                                         See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4555)
nsdev(4) <1>:                                  See 3.5.5.    (line 1679)
nsdev(4) <2>:                                  See 3.2.      (line 1212)
nsdev(4):                                      See 3.1.      (line 1057)
nullmod(4) <1>:                                See 3.3.      (line 1328)
nullmod(4):                                    See 3.1.      (line 1110)
nuls(4) <1>:                                   See 3.5.5.    (line 1686)
nuls(4) <2>:                                   See 3.2.      (line 1222)
nuls(4):                                       See 3.1.      (line 1072)
objdump(1):                                    See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4550)
open(2s):                                      See 3.3.      (line 1296)
perftest(8) <1>:                               See 3.5.4.    (line 1612)
perftest(8):                                   See 3.3.      (line 1320)
perftestn(8):                                  See 3.5.4.    (line 1617)
pic(1) <1>:                                    See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4410)
pic(1) <2>:                                    See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4079)
pic(1):                                        See 6.2.3.    (line 3646)
pipe(2s):                                      See 3.2.      (line 1234)
pipe(4) <1>:                                   See 3.5.5.    (line 1693)
pipe(4) <2>:                                   See 3.5.3.    (line 1475)
pipe(4) <3>:                                   See 3.3.      (line 1299)
pipe(4) <4>:                                   See 3.2.      (line 1230)
pipe(4):                                       See 3.1.      (line 1076)
pipemod(4) <1>:                                See 3.5.5.    (line 1700)
pipemod(4) <2>:                                See 3.3.      (line 1284)
pipemod(4):                                    See 3.1.      (line 1114)
proc(5):                                       See 3.5.3.    (line 1580)
refer(1) <1>:                                  See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4398)
refer(1) <2>:                                  See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4078)
refer(1):                                      See 6.2.3.    (line 3645)
rpm(1) <1>:                                    See 6.7.1.8.  (line 5548)
rpm(1) <2>:                                    See 6.7.1.4.  (line 5321)
rpm(1) <3>:                                    See 6.7.1.1.  (line 5138)
rpm(1) <4>:                                    See 6.5.1.    (line 4934)
rpm(1) <5>:                                    See 6.4.1.    (line 4866)
rpm(1) <6>:                                    See 6.3.1.    (line 4600)
rpm(1) <7>:                                    See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4446)
rpm(1) <8>:                                    See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3975)
rpm(1) <9>:                                    See 6.1.6.    (line 3381)
rpm(1) <10>:                                   See 6.1.5.    (line 3256)
rpm(1) <11>:                                   See 6.1.1.    (line 3061)
rpm(1) <12>:                                   See 6.1.      (line 2940)
rpm(1):
          See ``Linux Fast-STREAMS''.                        (line  493)
rpm(8) <1>:                                    See 6.4.1.    (line 4866)
rpm(8):                                        See 6.2.3.    (line 3550)
rpmbuild(1) <1>:                               See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4450)
rpmbuild(1):                                   See 6.2.3.    (line 3602)
sad(4) <1>:                                    See 3.6.1.    (line 1777)
sad(4) <2>:                                    See 3.5.5.    (line 1707)
sad(4) <3>:                                    See 3.5.3.    (line 1466)
sad(4) <4>:                                    See 3.3.      (line 1311)
sad(4) <5>:                                    See 3.2.      (line 1239)
sad(4):                                        See 3.1.      (line 1052)
sc(4) <1>:                                     See 3.6.1.    (line 1867)
sc(4) <2>:                                     See 3.5.5.    (line 1714)
sc(4) <3>:                                     See 3.5.3.    (line 1515)
sc(4) <4>:                                     See 3.3.      (line 1303)
sc(4):                                         See 3.1.      (line 1124)
scls(8) <1>:                                   See 3.5.3.    (line 1507)
scls(8):                                       See 3.3.      (line 1312)
sfx(4) <1>:                                    See 3.2.      (line 1248)
sfx(4):                                        See 3.1.      (line 1090)
soelim(1) <1>:                                 See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4392)
soelim(1) <2>:                                 See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4078)
soelim(1):                                     See 6.2.3.    (line 3645)
specfs(5) <1>:                                 See 3.5.1.    (line 1374)
specfs(5):                                     See 3.1.      (line 1038)
specfs(8):                                     See 3.5.1.    (line 1370)
specfs.sh(8):                                  See 3.5.1.    (line 1371)
spx(4) <1>:                                    See 3.2.      (line 1256)
spx(4):                                        See 3.1.      (line 1095)
sth(4) <1>:                                    See 3.6.1.    (line 1764)
sth(4):                                        See 3.5.5.    (line 1722)
strace(8) <1>:                                 See 3.5.3.    (line 1519)
strace(8):                                     See 3.2.      (line 1186)
strchg(1):                                     See 3.5.2.    (line 1397)
strclean(8) <1>:                               See 3.5.3.    (line 1534)
strclean(8):                                   See 3.2.      (line 1186)
strconf(1):                                    See 3.5.2.    (line 1407)
streams(8):                                    See 3.5.1.    (line 1381)
STREAMS(9) <1>:                                See 3.6.1.    (line 1821)
STREAMS(9) <2>:                                See 3.5.5.    (line 1721)
STREAMS(9) <3>:                                See 3.5.1.    (line 1385)
STREAMS(9) <4>:                                See 3.1.      (line 1043)
STREAMS(9):
          See ``Intent''.                                    (line   86)
streams.sh(8):                                 See 3.5.1.    (line 1382)
streams_mknod(8):                              See 3.5.3.    (line 1502)
strerr(8) <1>:                                 See 3.5.3.    (line 1539)
strerr(8):                                     See 3.2.      (line 1186)
strinfo(8):                                    See 3.5.3.    (line 1569)
strload(8):                                    See 3.5.3.    (line 1586)
strlog(4):                                     See 3.6.1.    (line 1757)
strlog(9) <1>:                                 See 3.6.1.    (line 1825)
strlog(9):                                     See 3.2.      (line 1185)
strreset(1):                                   See 3.5.2.    (line 1436)
strsetup(8):                                   See 3.5.3.    (line 1596)
strvf(8) <1>:                                  See 3.5.3.    (line 1601)
strvf(8):                                      See 3.2.      (line 1164)
tar(1) <1>:                                    See 6.7.1.2.  (line 5235)
tar(1):                                        See 6.1.5.    (line 3261)
tbl(1) <1>:                                    See 6.2.5.2.  (line 4404)
tbl(1) <2>:                                    See 6.2.5.1.  (line 4078)
tbl(1):                                        See 6.2.3.    (line 3645)
tee(1):                                        See 6.7.1.5.  (line 5449)
test-clone(8):                                 See 3.5.5.    (line 1628)
test-connld(8):                                See 3.5.5.    (line 1635)
test-echo(8):                                  See 3.5.5.    (line 1642)
test-fifo(8):                                  See 3.5.5.    (line 1649)
test-log(8):                                   See 3.5.5.    (line 1656)
test-loop(8):                                  See 3.5.5.    (line 1663)
test-mux(8):                                   See 3.5.5.    (line 1670)
test-nsdev(8):                                 See 3.5.5.    (line 1677)
test-nuls(8):                                  See 3.5.5.    (line 1684)
test-pipe(8):                                  See 3.5.5.    (line 1691)
test-pipemod(8):                               See 3.5.5.    (line 1698)
test-sad(8):                                   See 3.5.5.    (line 1705)
test-sc(8):                                    See 3.5.5.    (line 1712)
test-streams(8) <1>:                           See 3.5.5.    (line 1719)
test-streams(8) <2>:                           See 3.3.      (line 1342)
test-streams(8):                               See 3.2.      (line 1164)
testmod(4) <1>:                                See 3.6.1.    (line 1873)
testmod(4) <2>:                                See 3.3.      (line 1339)
testmod(4):                                    See 3.1.      (line 1130)
texinfo(1) <1>:                                See 6.2.5.1.  (line 3964)
texinfo(1):                                    See 6.2.3.    (line 3709)
wget(1):                                       See 6.1.5.    (line 3267)
Short Contents
**************

 Linux Fast-STREAMS Installation and Reference Manual
 About This Manual
 Preface
 Quick Start Guide
1 Introduction
2 Objective
3 Reference
4 Conformance
5 Releases
6 Installation
7 Troubleshooting
 Licenses
 Indices


Table of Contents
*****************

 Linux Fast-STREAMS Installation and Reference Manual
 About This Manual
 Preface
   Notice
   Abstract
     Objective
     Intent
     Audience
   Revisions
     Version Control
     ISO 9000 Compliance
   Disclaimer
     U.S. Government Restricted Rights
   Acknowledgements
     Sponsors
     Contributors
   Authors
   Maintainer
   Web Resources
 Quick Start Guide
   Linux Fast-STREAMS
     Release
     Prerequisites
     Installation
     Brief Installation Instructions
     Detailed Installation Instructions
1 Introduction
  1.1 Overview
  1.2 Organization of this Manual
  1.3 Conventions and Definitions
2 Objective
  2.1 Background
  2.2 What is STREAMS?
  2.3 Why STREAMS?
  2.4 Why STREAMS for Linux?
  2.5 History of STREAMS for Linux
  2.6 Why Fast?
3 Reference
  3.1 Files
  3.2 Drivers
  3.3 Modules
  3.4 Libraries
  3.5 Utilities
    3.5.1 Init Scripts
    3.5.2 User Utilities
    3.5.3 Administrative Utilities
    3.5.4 Performance Test Programs
    3.5.5 Conformance Test Programs
  3.6 Development
    3.6.1 Header Files
      3.6.1.1 User Space Programs
      3.6.1.2 Kernel Space Drivers and Modules
    3.6.2 Libraries
    3.6.3 Kernel Modules
    3.6.4 Manual Pages
4 Conformance
  4.1 STREAMS Compatibility
  4.2 Porting
5 Releases
  5.1 Prerequisites
  5.2 Compatibility
    5.2.1 GNU/Linux Distributions
    5.2.2 Kernel
    5.2.3 Architectures
    5.2.4 Linux STREAMS
  5.3 Release Notes
     Major changes for release streams-0.7a.6.rc3
     Major changes for release streams-0.7a.6.rc2
     Major changes for release streams-0.7a.6rc1
     Major changes for release streams-0.7a.5
     Major changes for release streams-0.7a.4
     Major changes for release streams-0.7a.3
     Major changes for release streams-0.7a-3
     Major changes for release streams-0.7a-2
     Initial release streams-0.7a-1
  5.4 Maturity
    5.4.1 Pre-Alpha Releases
    5.4.2 Alpha Releases
    5.4.3 Beta Releases
    5.4.4 Gamma Releases
    5.4.5 Production Releases
    5.4.6 Unstable Releases
  5.5 Bugs
    5.5.1 Defect Notices
    5.5.2 Known Defects
    5.5.3 Defect History
  5.6 Schedule
  5.7 History
6 Installation
  6.1 Downloading
    6.1.1 Downloading the Binary RPM
    6.1.2 Downloading the Debian DEB
    6.1.3 Downloading the Source RPM
    6.1.4 Downloading the Debian DSC
    6.1.5 Downloading the Tar Ball
    6.1.6 Downloading from CVS
  6.2 Configuration
    6.2.1 Configuring the Binary RPM
    6.2.2 Configuring the Debian DEB
    6.2.3 Configuring the Source RPM
    6.2.4 Configuring the Debian DSC
    6.2.5 Configuring the Tar Ball
      6.2.5.1 Configure Options
      6.2.5.2 Environment Variables
      6.2.5.3 Build
  6.3 Building
    6.3.1 Building from the Source RPM
    6.3.2 Building from the Debian DSC
    6.3.3 Building from the Tar Ball
      6.3.3.1 Native Build
      6.3.3.2 Cross-Build
      6.3.3.3 NexusWare Build
  6.4 Installing
    6.4.1 Installing the Binary RPM
    6.4.2 Installing the Debian DEB
    6.4.3 Installing the Tar Ball
  6.5 Removing
    6.5.1 Removing the Binary RPM
    6.5.2 Removing the Debian DEB
    6.5.3 Removing the Source RPM
    6.5.4 Removing the Debian DSC
    6.5.5 Removing the Tar Ball
  6.6 Loading
    6.6.1 Normal Module Loading
      6.6.1.1 Linux Fast-STREAMS Module Loading
    6.6.2 NexusWare Module Loading
      6.6.2.1 Linux STREAMS Module Loading
  6.7 Maintenance
    6.7.1 Makefile Targets
      6.7.1.1 User Targets
      6.7.1.2 Maintainer Targets
      6.7.1.3 Clean Targets
      6.7.1.4 Release Targets
      6.7.1.5 Logging Targets
      6.7.1.6 Problem Report Targets
      6.7.1.7 Release Archive Targets
      6.7.1.8 RPM Build Targets
      6.7.1.9 Debian Build Targets
7 Troubleshooting
  7.1 Test Suites
    7.1.1 Pre-installation Checks
      7.1.1.1 Pre-Installation System Checks
      7.1.1.2 Pre-Installation Maintenance Checks
      7.1.1.3 Specific Pre-Installation Checks
    7.1.2 Post-installation Checks
      7.1.2.1 Running Test Suites
  7.2 Problem Reports
    7.2.1 Problem Report Guidelines
    7.2.2 Generating Problem Reports
    7.2.3 Automatic Problem Reports
    7.2.4 Stand Alone Problem Reports
  7.3 Known Problems
 Licenses
   GNU General Public License
     Preamble
     How to Apply These Terms to Your New Programs
   GNU Lesser General Public License
     Preamble
     How to Apply These Terms to Your New Libraries
   GNU Free Documentation License
     Preamble
     How to use this License for your documents
 Indices
   Index of Concepts
   Index of Data Types
   Index of Functions and Macros
   Index of Variables and Constants
   Index of Files and Programs
   Index of Configuration Options
   Index of Makefile Targets
   Index of Authors
   Index of Manual Pages Referenced


-----

=========================================================================

 Copyright (c) 2001-2006  OpenSS7 Corporation  <http://www.openss7.com/>
 Copyright (c) 1997-2000  Brian Bidulock  <bidulock@openss7.org>

 All Rights Reserved.

 Permission is granted to make and distribute verbatim copies of this
 manual provided the copyright notice and this permission notice are
 preserved on all copies.

 Permission is granted to copy and distribute modified versions of this
 manual under the conditions for verbatim copying, provided that the
 entire resulting derived work is distributed under the terms of a
 permission notice identical to this one

 Since the Linux kernel and libraries are constantly changing, this
 manual page may be incorrect or out-of-date.  The author(s) assume no
 responsibility for errors or omissions, or for damages resulting from
 the use of the information contained herein.  The author(s) may not
 have taken the same level of care in the production of this manual,
 which is licensed free of charge, as they might when working
 professionally.

 Formatted or processed versions of this manual, if unaccompanied by the
 source, must acknowledge the copyright and authors of this work.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------

 U.S. GOVERNMENT RESTRICTED RIGHTS.  If you are licensing this Software
 on behalf of the U.S. Government ("Government"), the following
 provisions apply to you.  If the Software is supplied by the Department
 of Defense ("DoD"), it is classified as "Commercial Computer Software"
 under paragraph 252.227-7014 of the DoD Supplement to the Federal
 Acquisition Regulations ("DFARS") (or any successor regulations) and
 the Government is acquiring only the license rights granted herein (the
 license rights customarily provided to non-Government users).  If the
 Software is supplied to any unit or agency of the Government other than
 DoD, it is classified as "Restricted Computer Software" and the
 Government's rights in the Software are defined in paragraph 52.227-19
 of the Federal Acquisition Regulations ("FAR") (or any successor
 regulations) or, in the cases of NASA, in paragraph 18.52.227-86 of the
 NASA Supplement to the FAR (or any successor regulations).

=========================================================================

 Commercial licensing and support of this software is available from
 OpenSS7 Corporation at a fee.  See http://www.openss7.com/

=========================================================================
vim: ft=README tw=72 nocindent nosmartindent formatoptions+=tcqlorn
